DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES NATIONAL INSTITUTES OF HEALTH National Cancer Institute FY 2002 Budget Page No.
Organization Chart ............................................................................................................................2 Appropriation Language .....................................................................................................................3 Amounts Available for Obligation .......................................................................................................4 Justification Narrative .........................................................................................................................5 Budget Mechanism Table .................................................................................................................32 Budget Authority by Activity Table ...................................................................................................33 Summary of Changes .......................................................................................................................34 Budget Authority by Object Class ....................................................................................................36 Salaries and Expenses ......................................................................................................................37 Significant Items in House and Senate Appropriation Committee Reports .........................................38 Authorizing Legislation....................................................................................................................137 Appropriation History ....................................................................................................................138 Detail of Full Time Equivalent Employment (FTE) ...........................................................................139 Detail of Positions ..........................................................................................................................140 New Positions Requested...............................................................................................................141
NCI- 1
NATIONAL INSTITUTES OF HEALTH National Cancer Institute Organization Chart Office of the Director Director Dr. Richard Klausner Deputy Director Dr. Alan Rabson
NCI- 2 Division of Cancer Prevention Director Dr. Peter Greenwald
Center for Cancer Research Director Dr. Carl Barrett
Division of Cancer Epidemiology and Genetics Director Dr. Joseph Fraumeni
Division of Cancer Treatment and Diagnosis Director Dr. Robert Wittes
Division of Cancer Control and Population Sciences Director Dr. Barbara Rimer
Division of Cancer Biology Director Dr. Dinah Singer
Division of Extramural Activities Director Dr. Marvin Kalt
NATIONAL INSTITUTES OF HEALTH National Cancer Institute
For carrying out section 301 and title IV of the Public Health Service Act with respect to cancer, [$3,757,242,000] $4,177,203,000.
[Departments of Labor, Health and Human Services and Related Agencies Appropriations Act, as enacted by the Omnibus Consolidated and Emergency Supplemental Appropriations Act for Fiscal Year 2001 (P. L. 106-554)]
NCI- 3
National Institutes of Health National Cancer Institute Amounts Available for Obligation 1/ FY 2000 Actual $3,332,317,000 (17,763,000) 3,314,554,000 FY 2001 Estimate $3,757,242,000 (2,005,000) 3,755,237,000 FY 2002 Estimate $4,177,203,000 --4,177,203,000
Source of Funding Appropriation Enacted Rescission Subtotal, Adjusted Appropriation Real transfer to: Other NIH Institutes through the NIH Director's onepercent transfer authority Other HHS Agencies through Secretary's onepercent transfer authority Real transfer to HHS for the Office of Human Research Protection
(2,778,000)
---
---
(695,000) (0)
--(781,000)
-----
Comparative transfer from: Office of the Director for the Academic Research Enhancement Award program
1,577,000
1,643,000
Comparative transfer to: Other NIH Institutes as a result of a change in assessment formula for Central Services funding National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases for the Vaccine Research Laboratory
(2,867,000)
(13,671,000)
(18,171,000)
Subtotal Unobligated Balance, start of year 2/ Revenue from Breast Cancer Stamp 2/ Unobligated Balance, end of year 2/ Subtotal, adjusted budget authority Unobligated balance lapsing Total obligations
3,296,120,000 4,150,000 3,101,000 (3,753,000) 3,299,618,000 (0) 3,299,618,000
3,737,928,000 ------3,737,928,000 --3,737,928,000
4,177,203,000 ------4,177,203,000 --4,177,203,000
1/ Excludes the following amounts for reimbursable activities carried out by this account: FY 2000 - $15,932,100 FY 2001 - $20,000,000 FY 2002 - $22,360,000
Excludes $36,147,381 in FY 2000 and $26,700,000 in FY 2001 for royalties.
2/ Stamp Out Breast Cancer Act P.L.#105-41
NCI- 4
J USTIFICATION NATIONAL CANCER INSTITUTE
Authorizing Legislation: Section 301 and Title IV of the Public Health Service Act, as amended.
Reauthorizing legislation will be submitted.
Budget Authority: FY2000 Actual FTE BA 2,794 $3,299,618,000 FY 2001 Estimate FTE BA 3,150 $3,737,928,000 FY 2002 Estimate FTE BA 3,245 $4,177,203,000 Increase of Decrease FTE BA 95 $439,275,000
This document provides justification for the Fiscal Year 2002 activities of the National Cancer Institute (NCI), including HIV/AIDS activities.
A more detailed description of NIH-wide Fiscal Year 2002 HIV/AIDS activities can be found in the NIH section entitled "Office of AIDS Research (OAR)."
INTRODUCTION As the 21st century dawns, scientific discovery is occurring at a pace that would astound our forebears.
Nearly every day some new advance or insight brings us closer to answering one of the many questions that have long confounded scientists, and nowhere is the excitement more evident than in cancer research.
Our pace of discovery is fueled by progress in the explosion of information on the fundamental nature of cancer, the development of new tools and approaches for conducting clinical research to test these insights in patients, and the growing sophistication in behavioral and population research that allows us to understand and address the burden of cancer.
We are encouraged by evidence that progress in our understanding of cancer and our ability to detect and treat it contributed to a decline in the rates of new cancer and overall deaths from cancer in the United States between 1990 and 1997.1 For the first time, between 1996 and 1997, the annual number of cancer deaths did not rise, despite a growing and aging population.
And death rates for the four most common cancer sites ­ lung, colorectal, breast, and prostate ­ continue to drop, albeit slowly.
Our excitement is tempered, however, by the knowledge that far too many Americans continue to suffer and die from cancer each day.
Death rates are still rising for several cancers, including non-Hodgkin's 1
Annual Report to the Nation on the Status of Cancer, 1973-1997, prepared jointly by the National Cancer Institute, the American Cancer Society, the National Center for Health Statistics/Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, and the North American Association of Central Cancer Registries.
NCI- 5
lymphoma, multiple myeloma, and liver, kidney, and esophageal cancers.
Declines in the incidence of cancer stemming from dramatic reductions in adult tobacco use may stall ­ or even reverse ­ if teen smoking continues at current levels.
Moreover, the overall number of Americans who develop cancer is expected to increase as our population ages and "baby boomers" enter the time of life when cancer is most common.
And not all groups of people are benefiting equally from our advances against cancer.
Rates of colon cancer, for instance, are declining overall, but not among African Americans.
Too many Americans, for a host of reasons, lack access to high quality, cutting-edge cancer treatment and care.
An increase in the number of people with cancer will, in turn, place mounting pressure on our Nation's capacity to respond.
With the expected growth and aging of the U.S. Population, the costs of cancer treatment are predicted to nearly double over the next decade, rising to just under $100 billion.
The costs of screening more people will add another five to ten percent to this bill.
Keenly felt, but less easily calculated, are the productivity and contributions lost to society when people are afflicted with cancer.
NCI's proposed activities for Fiscal Year 2002 will support continued cutting edge cancer research as well as substantial investments in the essential building blocks of medical research: the training and career development of investigators, scientific tools and information resources, and collaborative research environments that foster the exchange of information and speed the progress of research.
NCI will also continue efforts to improve the transfer of research results into practice, research and enhance the quality of cancer care, and investigate and reduce disparities in the incidence and treatment of cancer.
The justification for our activities is straightforward.
We have advanced significantly in numerous areas of endeavors scientific advances that in turn provide opportunity for continued discovery in numerous areas.
We have the structures in place to take advantage of these opportunities but need to continue maintaining and building them.
Most importantly, we still have a lot of work to do.
We have the systems in place, good people standing ready to do it, and extraordinary opportunities to build upon past discovery that will help us achieve our goal to "stimulate and support research and its application - to achieve a future when all cancers are uncommon and easily treated."
S
CIENCE
ADVANCES
Through advances in our understanding of cancer at the molecular level, we are witnessing and facilitating a fundamental change in the way scientific discovery is accomplished.
Using a more "designed" research approach, we identify a range of compelling options for prevention, detection, diagnosis, and treatment; verify their efficacy using models and electronic tools; and validate them through extensive testing and clinical trials.
Increasingly, cancer research brings together and melds different scientific perspectives and the tools of multiple disciplines.
By integrating the work of epidemiologists, geneticists, and population scientists, we hope to better understand the potential interplay among inherited susceptibility, lifestyle, and exposure to environmental pollutants and infectious agents in cancer causation.
As the depth of our knowledge of cancer grows, we will be able to bring the benefits of increasingly sophisticated scientific discovery to the American people more quickly.
NCI- 6
New Approaches to Pathogenesis Powerful Tool Reveals Most Common Non-Hodgkin's Lymphoma Is Actually Two Diseases Lymphomas, which include Hodgkin's disease and non-Hodgkin's lymphoma (NHL), are the fifth most common type of cancer diagnosed and the sixth most common cause of cancer-related death in the United States.
Non-Hodgkin's lymphoma is the more common of the two basic lymphoma types.
This disease - often painless in its early stages - may occur in a single lymph node, a group of lymph nodes, or in another organ, and can spread to almost any part of the body, including the liver, bone marrow, and spleen.
The most common type of non-Hodgkin's lymphoma is an aggressive cancer called diffuse large B-cell lymphoma (DLBCL).
Forty percent of patients with a diagnosis of DLBCL are cured by standard multi-agent chemotherapy.
However, a compelling 60 percent of DLBCL patients fail to respond to chemotherapy.
NCI-supported scientists now have been able to use a novel microarray tool, which they have labeled the "lymphochip" to gain insight into this problem.
By mining the Cancer Genome Anatomy Project (CGAP) database for more than 18,000 genes important to both lymphoid malignancies and the immune system and placing them on a device similar to a computer chip, the researchers were able to compare gene activity of normal and cancerous B cells and to generate gene expression profiles, or "signatures," of the different cell types.
After examining several different forms of non-Hodgkin's lymphoma, the scientists discovered that DLBCL showed two distinct patterns of gene expression, suggesting that this diagnosis has lumped together two subtypes of NHL.
While unable to distinguish one from the other under a microscope, the tool conventionally used for diagnosis and cell typing, scientists now are able to use advanced technology to sort out these two biologically distinct subtypes of lymphoma and to subsequently identify two distinct clinical courses that DLBCL can take.
Although more research is needed, scientists are optimistic that expression signatures will lead them to more precise diagnoses and ultimately to more effective treatments for specific subtypes of this disease.
This study points the way to a future when physicians may be able to diagnose and treat cancer based on well-characterized biological differences among tumor cells, more accurately predict how aggressive a tumor will be, and utilize new and possibly more effective therapies tailored to the characteristics of an individual's disease.
Estrogen Replacement Therapy and Breast Cancer Risk The favorable effects of estrogen replacement therapy (ERT) on the heart (protection against coronary heart disease), bone (protection from osteoporosis), and quality of life (effective relief from menopausal symptoms) have made this treatment a desirable option for the majority of menopausal women.
And, some studies have also suggested that a combination of estrogen and progestin may make hormone replacement therapy less of a risk for certain types of cancer.
However, a team of NCI-supported researchers has found that women who use combined estrogenprogestin replacement therapy have a greater risk for developing breast cancer than those who use estrogen alone.
Using 15 years of follow-up data from 46,000 women who participated in the Breast Cancer Detection Demonstration Project, a nationwide breast cancer screening program, the scientists NCI- 7
found that, compared to non-users, the relative risk for breast cancer increased by eight percent per year for estrogen-progestin therapy compared to one percent for estrogen therapy alone in women who had used hormones during the previous four years.
Both groups had a higher risk than non-users.
Short-term use (two to three years) was not associated with increased risk, suggesting that women who take menopausal hormones for shorter periods are not at increased risk of breast cancer.
The increase in risk is still low for women taking both hormones, but this and other studies do suggest that women need to consider the possible risks and uncertainties associated with hormone replacement therapy, despite reported beneficial effects on the bones, the heart, and quality of life.
New Preventive Strategies against Disease Daily Smoking Is Not Necessary for Nicotine Dependence in Young People More than 3 million adolescents in the United States smoke, and every day another 6,000 young people begin smoking.
While cigarette smoking has been declining among American adults, the number of adolescents who smoke has risen sharply since 1992.
Like adult smokers, adolescents report frequent unsuccessful attempts to quit, and they cite withdrawal symptoms and the "urge to smoke" among the reasons why they find it difficult to give up smoking.
However, because many young people have not yet become daily smokers, researchers have tended not to regard them as nicotine dependent.
The traditional model for the development of nicotine dependence is progression from experimental tobacco use to occasional use, then to daily use that increases in frequency, resulting in dependence.
Recently, however, NCI-supported researchers found evidence of nicotine dependence and withdrawal among young tobacco smokers before they become daily smokers.
They found that 63 percent of a group of 7th-grade students (ages 12-13) who smoked one or more cigarettes a month reported experiencing one or more symptoms of nicotine dependence.
These symptoms included cravings, withdrawal symptoms (depressed mood, irritability, anger, anxiety, difficulty concentrating, and restlessness) and loss of control over the amount and duration of tobacco use.
More than one in five of these students reported symptoms of nicotine dependence within 4 weeks of beginning to smoke with 20-68 percent of adolescent smokers being classified as dependent.
And about two-thirds reported experiencing withdrawal symptoms when they cut down or tried to quit smoking.
This finding points to the importance of preventing young people from starting to smoke, the value of intervening early to help young smokers quit, and the need to develop new assessment instruments for studying tobacco use in young people.
Several Factors Predict Smoking Cessation in Adolescents In a follow-up study to determine their tobacco quitting behaviors, 15.6 percent of adolescents who participated in a 1989 survey of smokers aged 12-19 years were found to have quit during the four years following the original survey.
"Smokers" were defined as those who had smoked more than 100 cigarettes in their lifetime and had smoked at least one cigarette during the 30 days before the 1989 survey.
NCI- 8
Researchers identified factors that predict quitting among adolescent smokers and discovered that adolescents were significantly more likely to quit smoking when: (1) they were occasional, rather than daily, smokers; (2) they had never quit smoking or had previously quit for 14 days or more; (3) their mothers did not smoke; (4) they assumed they would not be smoking 1 year later; and (5) they had few symptoms of depression.
These findings have important implications for treatment and cessation programs for adolescent smokers.
Nicotine dependence is only one factor in predicting success at quitting.
Other variables include the emotional state of the smoker, depression, and environmental factors such as a mother who smokes.
All these need to be taken into account when developing adolescent smoking cessation programs.
The data also provide additional support for the role of depression in smoking behavior.
Weighing the Risks and Benefits of Tamoxifen in Breast Cancer Prevention In response to findings from the Breast Cancer Prevention Trial that tamoxifen treatment produced a 49 percent reduction in the risk of invasive breast cancer in a population of women at elevated risk, the National Cancer Institute sponsored a workshop to study and develop information tools to assist in counseling and in weighing the risks and benefits of tamoxifen.
Scientists reviewed information on the incidence of invasive breast cancer and of in situ lesions as well as on several other health outcomes in the absence of tamoxifen treatment.
They then reviewed data on the effects of tamoxifen on these outcomes and developed methods to compare the risks and benefits of tamoxifen.
They found that the risks and benefits of tamoxifen depend on age and race as well as on a woman's specific risk factors for breast cancer.
In particular, the absolute risks from tamoxifen of endometrial cancer, stroke, pulmonary embolism, and deep vein thrombosis increase with age.
These absolute risks differ between white and black women, as does the protective effect of tamoxifen on fractures.
The primary conclusion from this study was that tamoxifen is most beneficial for younger women with an elevated risk of breast cancer.
The researchers developed tables and aids for use by health care providers and women in weighing the risks and benefits of using tamoxifen to reduce breast cancer risk.
New Avenues for the Development of Therapeutics Novel Bone Marrow Transplant Offers New Hope to Patients with Cancers of the Blood Bone marrow transplants are an effective treatment for patients with cancers of the blood: leukemia, multiple myeloma, and non-Hodgkin's lymphoma.
The bone marrow is where most hematopoietic stem cells ­ immature cells from which all blood cells develop ­ are found.
A bone marrow treatment involves destroying the patient's diseased bone marrow with high doses of chemotherapy or radiation and replacing it with healthy marrow from a matched donor.
Conventional bone marrow transplants are not normally performed on patients older than 55 or on patients who are unfit to withstand the intensive, highly toxic treatment regimen.
Thus, this potentially curable treatment is currently available only to the minority of patients with cancers of the blood who are under 55 and in good physical condition.
NCI-supported researchers have developed an experimental bone marrow transplant procedure known NCI- 9
as a "mini-transplant."
Instead of using high doses of radiation to kill cancer cells, this procedure takes advantage of the immune properties of donor stem cells.
In a process called the "graft versus tumor" effect, the donor cells recognize and kill cancer cells while tolerating the patient's normal cells and tissues.
The mini-transplant requires a much lower dose of radiation than a conventional bone marrow transplant ­ just enough to suppress the patient's immune system without wiping out the bone marrow.
The procedure has been performed on over 80 patients whose average age was 56.
Patients did not experience hair loss, severe mouth sores, low levels of blood cells, and other adverse effects that frequently occur in patients receiving conventional transplants.
Five patients (six percent) died within the first year; this compares with a mortality rate of 25 percent for younger patients with chronic myeloid leukemia who underwent conventional transplants.
Most mini-transplant patients went home from the hospital the same day.
By contrast, recipients of conventional transplants are hospitalized in intensive care for 2 to 3 months.
Rates of graft-versus-host disease, in which the transplanted tissue mounts an immune attack on the patient's cells, were similar to those that occur after conventional transplants.
If shown to be effective in Phase III clinical trials, the mini-transplant procedure will make bone marrow transplants more available, less toxic, less costly, and more effective.
The procedure may also be effective in treating solid tumors as well as autoimmune diseases, genetic diseases, and sickle cell anemia.
Applying Laboratory Research to Develop a Therapy for Chronic Myelogenous Leukemia Understanding the molecular mechanisms that contribute to chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML), a form of leukemia that affects white blood cells or granulocytes as they form in the bone marrow, has led to a promising, targeted new treatment for this disease.
For some time, scientists have known that the Philadelphia (Ph) chromosome, which causes the production of the tyrosine kinase enzyme, is unique to tumor cells and that nearly all patients with CML carry the genetic mutation that gives rise to it.
But it was just recently that NCI-supported scientists discovered the underlying mechanism by which CML arises and progresses.
The researchers were able to show that leukemia cells in nearly all CML patients express an abnormal protein known as Bcr-Abl and that this aberrant protein alone is enough to cause CML.
The researchers also established that the tyrosine kinase activity produced by the Bcr-Abl protein is required for the disease to progress.
The researchers were then able to use this information to determine that a new drug known as STI571, developed by Novartis Pharmaceuticals, provided an opportunity to test their hypothesis that targeting cells that express Bcr-Abl might halt or slow CML.
In cell culture and animal studies, STI571 specifically targeted Bcr-Abl expressing leukemia cells with no obvious effect on normal cells.
In studies of human patients, the researchers found that all patients with chronic-phase CML who were treated with STI571 had complete remission.
Several patients even showed a complete disappearance of the Ph chromosome.
The researchers have yet to find any toxic effects of the experimental drug.
Their work is an important demonstration of how laboratory research can eventually be translated into the development of a powerful new therapeutic agent for cancer.
New Drug Extends Lives of Patients with Most Common Adult Leukemia Chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL) is the most common adult leukemia in the United States, with NCI- 10
about 10,000 new cases occurring each year.
The disease, which usually affects people over age 55, generally progresses slowly.
In the early stages, patients commonly have no symptoms and may require no treatment for years.
When the disease progresses, however, chemotherapy is warranted.
There is no cure for CLL and patients with advanced disease live an average of not more than 2 years.
For decades, there have been no advances in the treatment of CLL.
Yet, a recent clinical study coordinated by NCI has demonstrated that fludarabine, a chemotherapy developed in the 1980's, can extend the lives of patients with progressive CLL.
The study compared the effectiveness of fludarabine with chlorambucil ­ the standard agent for CLL treatment ­ in 544 previously untreated patients.
Fludarabine was significantly more active than chlorambucil, producing higher complete and overall response rates.
Furthermore, responses to fludarabine were significantly more durable, lasting 29 months compared to 19 months for chlorambucil.
There were no meaningful differences in toxicity between the two drugs.
Because of these results, the approach to treating this disease is changing, and fludarabine is being used more often as a first-line treatment for patients with progressive CLL.
Early Hormonal Therapy Extends Lives of Prostate Cancer Patients Prostate cancer is the most common form of cancer, other than skin cancer, among men in the United States and is second only to lung cancer as a cause of cancer-related death among men.
Several treatment options are available including surgery, radiation, and drugs.
The stage of disease and the patient's age and overall health are used to make treatment choices.
Because male hormones (especially testosterone) can help prostate cancer to grow, drugs or surgery to reduce male hormone levels also can be used.
This hormonal therapy is usually confined to patients with more advanced disease because of side effects.
However, some researchers and clinicians have long questioned whether earlier use of hormonal therapy can prolong survival for patients who have not been cured by surgery or radiation.
NCI-supported investigators conducted a randomized clinical trial in which men who had been treated with surgery for early-stage prostate cancer were assigned either to receive immediate hormonal therapy or to simply be observed until their disease progressed.
All of the men had microscopic tumor metastases in their lymph nodes (node positive), putting them at high risk for recurrence of their cancer.
A total of 98 patients were enrolled in the study between 1988 and 1993 and followed for an average of 7 years.
At the end of the follow-up period, 7 of 47 men who received immediate hormonal therapy had died compared with 18 of 51 men in the observation group.
Three of the deaths in the treatment group and 16 of the deaths in the observation group were due to prostate cancer.
At the time of the last follow-up, 36 men in the treatment group (77 percent) and 9 men in the observation group (18 percent) were alive and had no evidence of recurrent disease.
The results of this trial, together with evidence from previous studies, support the hypothesis that early hormonal therapy may prolong the survival of men with prostate cancer.
The trial has changed the standard of care for node-positive prostate cancer patients, and the dramatic results also suggest that early administration of hormonal therapy could extend the lives of many other prostate cancer patients.
Experimental Technique Shows Promise in Treating Liver Metastases in Patients with Colorectal Cancer NCI- 11
Approximately 60 percent of patients with colorectal cancer experience metastasis of their cancer to the liver.
Although surgery is commonly used to remove these liver metastases, there is currently no standard way to treat microscopic tumors (micrometastases) that remain after surgery or to prevent tumors from spreading to other organs.
And, some patients have liver metastases that ­ because of their location, number, or other factors ­ cannot be surgically removed.
Despite aggressive chemotherapy, life expectancy for patients with inoperable liver metastases of colorectal cancer ranges from 2 months to 2 years.
Results of two clinical trials support the use of hepatic arterial infusion (HAI) for more effective treatment of these liver tumors.
HAI is an experimental technique for delivering high doses of chemotherapeutic drugs directly to liver tumors while minimizing toxicity to the liver and other organs.
Unlike other organs, the liver has a dual blood supply; liver tumors get their blood supply largely from the hepatic artery, whereas normal liver cells obtain their supply from the portal vein.
HAI works by infusing drugs through a catheter or pump in the hepatic artery.
The technique recently has shown promising results in clinical trials conducted by two groups of NCI-supported investigators.
One trial compared the efficacy of a combination of standard chemotherapy and HAI with standard chemotherapy alone in 156 patients who had undergone surgical removal of liver metastases of colorectal cancer.
After 2 years, overall survival was 86 percent in the group treated with combined therapy compared with 72 percent in the group receiving standard chemotherapy alone.
Survival free of recurrence of liver tumors was 90 percent and 60 percent, respectively.
In the second trial, 34 patients with inoperable primary or metastatic liver tumors were treated with a variant of HAI known as isolated hepatic perfusion.
Among patients with colorectal cancer, the response rate was 80 to 90 percent.
The median duration of response was over 18 months.
In most patients, treatment resulted in significant regression of bulky liver tumors.
These studies demonstrate that patients with both operable and inoperable liver metastases of colorectal cancer can benefit from HAI. Anti-Angiogenic Agents Show Promise in Treating AIDS-Related and Other Cancers In one of the most compelling findings to date in a clinical trial of a treatment for an AIDS-related cancer, investigators recently reported that thalidomide is an effective treatment for AIDS-related Kaposi's sarcoma.
Because this cancer is heavily dependent on the development of tiny new blood vessels for its growth (a process known as angiogenesis), scientists had hypothesized that therapies that block the formation of new blood vessels, such as thalidomide, could be particularly effective in combating this malignancy.
Among the participating patients who received at least 5 weeks of therapy, nearly half (47 percent) saw their tumors shrink.
In addition to suggesting an effective new treatment for Kaposi's sarcoma, this study is one of the first to establish that an anti-angiogenic drug can reduce an established tumor.
Progress with Antibodies as Anticancer Agents Monoclonal antibodies are laboratory-produced proteins that can locate and bind to specific proteins expressed by cancer cells.
NCI-supported researchers are exploring the use of a monoclonal antibody called C225 in cancer treatment.
C225 binds to proteins that are frequently overproduced in cancer cells ­ epidermal growth factor receptors ­ and inhibits the growth of cancer cells.
In a recent series of Phase I studies, C225 showed activity against epithelial tumors and head and neck cancer when given NCI- 12
alone or in combination with standard treatments.
Treatment with C225 was well tolerated by patients.
Investigators are currently studying the effectiveness of C225 in combination with other treatments against head, neck, and pancreatic cancers.
Genomics and Genetic Medicine Anti-Apoptosis Gene is Overexpressed in Cancer Cells Apoptosis, or programmed cell death, is a normal, gene-directed physiological process that eliminates unneeded, old, or damaged cells.
Selected genes regulate a cascade of signaling pathways in the cell, causing targeted cells to stop dividing and commit suicide.
This process is important to embryonic development, the daily maintenance of body systems, and the prevention of cellular overgrowth.
Its disruption, however, contributes to many diseases, including cancer.
For example, a mutation can occur in a gene that induces apoptosis, thwarting the signal to self-destruct.
Without this signal, malignant cells can be allowed to grow unchecked.
Apoptosis is currently the focus of intense interest by cancer researchers who hope that a better understanding of this process will help to explain how cancer arises and point the way to the development of new treatment strategies.
NCI-supported investigators have discovered a gene that appears to be a critical regulator of apoptosis and to be particularly important in cancer.
This gene, named survivin, is the smallest member of a family of genes known as apoptosis inhibitors.
The investigators have demonstrated that survivin is abundantly expressed in many malignant tumors, including basal and squamous cell skin cancers, metastatic melanoma, and bladder cancer.
However, it is not expressed in normal tissue adjacent to the tumors.
The researchers have also shown in model tumor cell lines that blocking survivin expression results in spontaneous apoptosis.
A recent genomic analysis found that survivin was invariably expressed in cancer but not in normal tissues.
Other data suggest that survivin plays a key role in cell development by preventing apoptosis during cell division.
When it is overexpressed, however, as it is in cancer cells, its anti-apoptosis function may allow cells that should have been destroyed to proliferate.
Another line of investigation has shown that survivin is highly expressed in the newly formed blood vessels of tissue that forms over a healing wound.
The growth of new blood vessels, or angiogenesis, is essential for tumor growth.
These findings suggest that survivin holds promise both as a marker of cancer progression and as a possible target for therapeutic intervention.
Because survivin appears to have an anti-apoptosis function, blocking its expression could hypothetically promote apoptosis in cancer cells.
In addition, since survivin seems to play a key role in angiogenesis, blocking its expression could inhibit the bloodvessel development that is essential for tumor growth.
These approaches will need to be tested in animal models and if they continue to show promise, in clinical trials.
Gene Is a Critical Player in Tumor Metastasis The most damaging change that can occur during cancer progression is the spread of cancerous cells to organs distant from the primary site of disease.
In this process, known as metastasis, cells break off from tumors, enter the bloodstream, and travel to other organs, where they grow into new tumors.
Metastasis is ultimately responsible for the deaths of most cancer patients, but it remains a poorly
NCI- 13
understood process.
Researchers do know that, in order to metastasize, tumor cells must complete a complex series of steps that involve numerous molecular changes.
A complete understanding of the molecular basis by which tumors spread to distant organs is important to the development of new strategies to diagnose, control, and treat metastatic cancer.
NCI-funded investigators have now identified a gene that causes noninvasive, poorly metastatic melanoma cells to become invasive and metastatic.
Using modern molecular technology that allows the analysis of several thousand genes at a time, the investigators examined genes expressed by mouse and human melanoma cells, some metastatic and some not, to identify genes involved in changing tumor cell behavior that might cause the cells to become highly invasive and metastatic.
This gene analysis produced several promising candidate genes, one of which is rhoC, known to be involved in tumor cell motility and invasion.
When rhoC was expressed in poorly metastatic human melanoma cells, the cells became highly motile and metastatic.
In contrast, when rhoC expression in metastatic cells was inhibited, the cells became less motile and were poorly metastatic.
The investigators are currently testing the hypothesis that rhoC can confer metastatic properties on other human tumor cells.
These results demonstrate that molecular characterization of tumor cells can provide more refined and clinically useful definitions of tumors by differentiating those that are malignant but noninvasive from those that are invasive and metastatic.
Studies like these open opportunities to develop more effective strategies for diagnosis and treatment.
Predicting Lung Cancer by Detecting Methylated Genes Lung cancer is the leading cause of cancer death in the United States and is expected to reach epidemic proportions throughout the world during this century.
Although significant advances have been made in the identification of DNA markers for many types of cancer, a recent study by NCI-supported researchers may for the first time provide clues for developing such markers for early lung cancer.
These molecular markers are unique signatures of cancer cells that can be used to detect cancer in its earliest stages, before it can be found by other means and when treatment is more likely to be successful.
An ideal DNA marker should be detectable early enough in the disease process for treatment to improve the patient's prognosis.
It should also be easy to detect in a fluid or tissue that can be collected from patients without the need for invasive procedures.
Because both current and former cigarette smokers have increased secretions, or sputum, from the bronchi, the branch-like passageways leading from the throat to the lungs, studies of DNA markers for lung cancer have focused on analyzing genes isolated from the sputum of former and current smokers with lung cancer.
Investigators focused on the p16 and MGMT genes, both of which are good candidates for molecular markers of early lung cancer.
The p16 gene plays a key role in regulating cell cycles, and MGMT protects cells from the cancerous effects of substances like cigarette smoke.
The researchers conducted the study using genetic material isolated from sputum samples of patients with a form of lung cancer known as squamous cell carcinoma (SCC).
The patients included current and former smokers, as well as individuals exposed to radon through mining.
The researchers found that when genes such as p16 and MGMT, which normally help to protect against cancer, are in the presence of an extra
NCI- 14
chemical group such as cigarette smoke, they become inactive, and cancer may be more likely to develop, a process called methylation.
Methylation of one of these genes was found in the sputum of every one of the SCC patients studied and was seen not only at the time of diagnosis, but also in all the sputum samples that had been collected from 5 months to nearly 3 years before lung cancer could be clinically detected.
Scientists' ability to detect methylation in genes therefore may hold great promise for finding lung cancer at a very early stage and may be useful for detecting other forms of cancer as well.
Bioengineering, Bioimaging, and Bioinformatics During the course of their treatment and follow-up, cancer patients often undergo both computed tomography (CT) and positron emission tomography (PET) scanning.
Each type of imaging provides physicians with distinct information on a patient's condition: a CT scan reveals the precise size, shape, and location of a tumor, while a PET scan's focus on metabolic function can indicate whether it is growing or shrinking.
Yet on its own, each form of imaging has its drawbacks.
CT scanning cannot always capture the subtle details necessary to determine whether cancer may have spread.
Similarly, PET scanning lacks the precision needed to pinpoint the location of a tumor.
As a result, both types of scans may be required to obtain a complete picture of a patient's condition ­ and even then, physicians face the difficult task of matching up PET and CT scan results.
Recently, however, NCI-funded investigators put the final touches on an imaging system that aligns the CT anatomical scan and the PET functional scan and performs them both simultaneously, reducing the number of scans cancer patients must undergo and providing their physicians with a single set of test results.
After 8 years of testing and development and the creation of special computer software to control the two imaging processes simultaneously, the Food and Drug Administration in October 2000 approved the combined PET/CT scanner.
When physicians begin using the new medical imaging system at cancer centers around the country in early 2001, it is expected to substantially improve their ability to diagnose cancer, determine how far it has spread, and track their patients' response to treatment.
Health Disparities: Biomedical and Behavioral Approaches Study Supports Equal Treatment - Equal Outcomes Conclusions from Previous Studies If discovered at an early stage, non-small-cell lung cancer is potentially curable by surgical resection.
However, two disparities have been noted between black patients and white patients with this disease.
Blacks are less likely to receive surgical treatment than whites, and they are likely to die sooner than whites.
When NCI-supported researchers undertook a population-based study to estimate the disparity in the rates of surgical treatment and to evaluate the extent to which this disparity is associated with differences in overall survival for non-small-cell lung cancer patients, they were interested in two questions: Is there a difference in the rate of surgical treatment between white patients and black patients? and Does this discrepancy in part explain the difference in survival between black patients and
NCI- 15
white patients with lung cancer? Study patients were 65 years of age or older who were diagnosed between 1985 and 1993 with stage I or II non-small-cell lung cancer.
The 10,984 patients in this study (860 black and 10,124 non-Hispanic white) were all Medicare recipients residing in 1 of the 10 study areas of the Surveillance, Epidemiology, and End Results (SEER) program.
Data on the diagnosis, stage of disease, treatment, and demographic characteristics of the patients were obtained from the SEER database.
Information on coexisting illnesses, type of Medicare coverage, and survival was obtained from linked Medicare inpatient discharge records.
The rate of surgery was 12.7 percentage points lower for black patients than for white patients (64.0 percent vs. 76.7 percent), and the 5-year survival rate was also lower for blacks (26.4 percent vs. 34.1 percent).
However, among the patients undergoing surgery, survival was similar for the two racial groups, as it was among those who did not undergo surgery.
Furthermore, analyses in which adjustments were made for factors that are predictive of either candidacy for surgery or survival did not alter the influence of race on these outcomes.
These analyses lung cancer, as among blacks.
promising way suggest that the lower survival rate among black patients with early-stage, non-small-cell compared with white patients, is largely explained by the lower rate of surgical treatment Increasing the rate of surgical treatment for black patients would appear to be a of improving survival in this group.
NEW ACTIVITIES Advances such as those described above and the changes that underlie them are driving an evolution and rethinking of NCI's activities.
These new initiatives are accelerating the pace of discovery, speeding our efforts to unravel cancer's intricacies, and addressing concerns of quality and disparities in cancer care, access to information, and research opportunity.
Tissue Array Research Program Cancer researchers nationwide may soon be able to dramatically accelerate their work using a new tissue analysis technology.
The new technology, developed by the National Human Genome Research Institute, makes it possible to store hundreds of very small tissue samples on a single laboratory slide, in a "tissue microarray."
Unlike traditional tissue analysis tools, which allow scientists to examine only a few tissue samples at a time, or other types of microarrays that contain only DNA, tissue microarrays permit scientists to examine hundreds of tumor samples at once.
NCI's Tissue Array Research Program (TARP) began making tissue microarrays available to investigators across the country in the fall of 2000.
Not only does this new technology have the potential to accelerate research by hastening the process of identifying the unique characteristics of cancer cells, but it also can provide investigators with greater flexibility in their studies.
For example, tissue microarrays may include samples from many different types of tumors for screening purposes, or may contain tissues from various stages of a single kind of tumor for comparison studies.
Molecular Target Drug Discovery Program NCI- 16
Identifying, characterizing, and validating promising new molecular targets - i.e., potentially vulnerable sites in the cancer cell such as proteins, receptors, enzymes, or cellular pathways essential to cancer growth ­ is the first step in the process of developing targeted cancer drugs.
This new approach to cancer prevention and treatment involves the development of agents that selectively take aim at newly identified molecules or pathways to block, delay, or arrest cancer progression.
To encourage creative investigation in this area, NCI will fund molecular target drug discovery grants to support (1) identification of novel molecular targets for prevention and treatment, (2) validation of targets as a basis for cancer drug discovery, and (3) development of tests to detect the effects of various agents on the targets.
NCI also will support exploratory grants to help scientists gather preliminary data that will render these projects more competitive for the regular grant funding process; small business grants to help small businesses launch commercial products (e.g., tests to screen agents for their effectiveness against high-priority targets); and supplemental grants to enable NCI grantees to extend the goals of their active grants to include studies related to drug discovery.
Exploring Gene-Environment Interactions through Population Studies Establishing significant and valid evidence for gene-environment interactions requires studies of large populations over long periods of time.
NCI is pursuing two types of population studies for this purpose - cohort studies and case-control studies.
In cohort studies, researchers prospectively collect information on exposures to factors that might affect cancer risk.
This type of study is useful for cancers that occur frequently enough to generate large sample sizes and is particularly useful - in fact sometimes the only means - for evaluating exposures and susceptibilities for which measurement may be altered by the presence of disease or its diagnosis or treatment.
Participants are asked to provide biologic samples and then are systematically followed over time to determine who does or does not develop cancer.
This information from large population groups provides strong indicators of the cancer risk associated with specified exposure and genetic profiles, opening doors for possible earlier detection for those at high-risk.
Because such studies can be extremely costly and challenging to pursue, NCI is establishing a Cohort Consortium of investigators from around the world who already have high-quality epidemiologic data and stored sources of DNA on large numbers of individuals who are being followed for the development of malignancy.
The Consortium will develop the resources and infrastructure needed to address gene-environment interactions in cancer etiology in a systematic and coordinated manner.
In case-control studies, researchers retrospectively examine exposure histories and genetic profiles of people who already have cancer and compare them with people who have not developed cancer.
NCI is assembling a Case-Control Consortium to support large-scale studies of gene-environment interactions for less common cancers.
Quality of Cancer Care In recognition of the importance of understanding and more effectively addressing concerns about the quality of care received by cancer patients at all stages of their experience, NCI has identified the Quality of Cancer Care as one of the NCI Challenge areas beginning in Fiscal Year 2002.
Efforts at NCI- 17
NCI to evaluate the delivery of cancer care and track how variations in treatment affect patient outcomes include several new and ongoing initiatives.
Of special significance is the upcoming identification of up to a dozen sites around the country that will form a consortium for tracking cancer care practice patterns and assessing outcomes in patients with lung and colorectal cancer.
Researchers in this new Cancer Care Outcomes Research and Surveillance (CanCORS) Consortium will identify newly diagnosed patients with lung and colorectal cancer, monitor the care they receive, and compare the results of their treatment.
The data collected during the course of this project and subsequent analyses by consortium investigators are expected to permit a more in-depth assessment of cancer care and outcomes in a wider range of patient populations and delivery settings than any previous research effort.
Findings from this project should also help explain why some groups of cancer patients may not be receiving optimal treatment and identify strategies for improving the quality of their care.
Other NCI initiatives aimed at improving the quality of care involve more studies of cancer care and outcomes among patients participating in the Medicare program.
When linked with data on cancer incidence and survival from NCI's Surveillance, Epidemiology, and End Results Program, Medicare databases have proven to be such a very rich source of data on quality of care.
For this reason, NCI plans to expand its research in this area, and extend it to the under 65 population, by creating similar databases of information from private insurers.
Health Disparities In recognition of a growing society-wide concern over persistent health disparities between different population groups, and in conjunction with HHS and NIH-wide activities to address these disparities, NCI has also designated Reducing Cancer-Related Health Disparities as a special NCI Challenge in the Fiscal Year 2002 Plan and Budget proposal.
A new Center to Reduce Cancer Health Disparities will oversee the implementation of the NCI's Strategic Plan to Reduce Health Disparities and efforts to find ways to translate research discoveries into the delivery of services that will reduce differences in health status and outcomes.
In April 2000, the Special Populations Networks for Cancer Awareness Research and Training project established a group of 17 universities, medical schools, and teaching hospitals to create and implement cancer control, prevention, research, and training programs in minority and underserved communities.
The cooperative relationships established by the Networks with community groups over the next five years are expected to extend the reach of NCI's cancer awareness activities, encourage the participation of minority patients in clinical trials, and improve training and career development opportunities for minority investigators.
A similar initiative established formal partnerships between NCI-designated Cancer Centers and minority-serving institutions, such as historically black and tribal colleges, in the spring of 2001.
The partnerships - which NCI is funding jointly with the NIH Office of Research on Minority Health - will help support and stabilize research projects and research training activities in minority-serving institutions, initiate long-term collaborations, and improve the effectiveness of Cancer Center research, education, and outreach activities.
NCI- 18
O THER AREAS OF INTEREST Over the past few years, literally dozens of new opportunities for research have been created through the Phased Innovation Award, the Unconventional Innovation Program, and NCI's functional imaging initiatives.
These programs enable researchers to develop, access, and use new technologies.
In addition, initiatives like the Cancer Genetics Network, the Early Detection Research Network, the Mouse Models of Human Cancer Consortium, and the Specialized Programs of Research Excellence bring together researcher communities and their collective resources, allowing them to ask questions on a larger scale.
By combining the efforts of engineering technology and biomedical science, we have been able to devise highly sophisticated imaging tools for detecting, diagnosing, and even aiding in the treatment of cancer patients.
The development of common forms, terminology, and reporting requirements for use in cancer clinical trials is increasing our ability to do research on a large scale and with greater complexity.
And, we now are able to store and disseminate data on thousands of tumor tissue samples, making cancer information instantly available to researchers around the world.
As we look ahead to Fiscal Year 2002, we anticipate significant ongoing and new activity concentrated in our Centers, Networks, and Consortia, as well in areas of special concern such as genetics, technology development, surveillance research, drug discovery, clinical trials, and bioinformatics.
Centers of Research Excellence Centers of Research Excellence bring together interdisciplinary and translational research teams to focus on specific diseases, treatment approaches, biological processes, and basic and behavioral scientific research areas.
Their purpose is to address emerging scientific opportunities and move them forward at an accelerated pace.
The first group of these centers, the Specialized Programs of Research Excellence (SPOREs), were created in 1992 and focused on specific cancers.
They continue to serve as hubs for translational research by providing an environment for dynamic interaction among laboratory, clinical, and population researchers to most efficiently move research toward application.
SPORE centers have been established in breast, prostate, lung, gastrointestinal, and ovarian cancer.
NCI plans to expand this program to include additional centers in breast and prostate cancer and to add new ones in head and neck cancer, brain cancer, and lymphoma.
NCI- 19
The success of the SPORE has spurred NCI to establish similar programs using this blueprint.
These include Transdisciplinary Tobacco Use Research Centers, In Vivo Cellular and Molecular Imaging Centers, and Interdisciplinary Research Teams in Molecular Target Assessment.
Plans are underway to create Centers of Excellence in Cancer Communications Research (CECCRs) and Centers for Population Health, both areas where the results of the research can be used to narrow the gap between discovery and application and to reduce health disparities among our citizens.
The interdisciplinary research conducted through the CECCRs will address the many complexities of cancer communications - from how to increase people's understanding of information about cancer to the implications of the rapid evolution of new media to understanding and addressing the needs of diverse audiences.
The Centers for Population Health will expand understanding of the social and environmental causes of cancer-related health disparities and the psychosocial, behavioral, and biological factors that mediate them and develop hypotheses for cancer control research at the individual, social, institutional, and policy levels.
Early Detection Research Network Designed as a national consortium to support collaborative research among academic and industry investigators with varied expertise, the Early Detection Research Network (EDRN) is an innovative, investigator-initiated project that aims to identify and evaluate molecular markers and technologies for earlier detection and risk assessment for all major cancers.
The EDRN is striving to link the discovery of biomarkers directly to the next steps in the process of developing early detection tests.
These discoveries will lead to work that confirms and improves the accuracy of the markers and then to early clinical validation of the tests.
The program is unprecedented in its charge and scope - to develop approaches for identifying people at high-risk for cancer that will ultimately allow medical practitioners to focus on prevention rather than on treatment.
EDRN research is funded through: § Eighteen Biomarker Developmental Laboratories to identify, characterize, and refine techniques for finding molecular, genetic, and biologic early warning signals of cancer.
§ Three Biomarker Validation Laboratories that serve as intermediaries between the Biomarker Developmental Laboratories and general clinical settings.
The role of the validation laboratories will be to standardize tests and assure reproducibility, and then scale up production and ready the best biomarker tests for clinical trials.
§ Nine Clinical/Epidemiology Centers that focus on providing the network with blood, tissue, other biological samples, and medical information on families with histories of cancer.
These libraries will serve as vital resources for the large-scale evaluation of cancer biomarkers.
§ A Data Management and Coordination Center to develop standards for data reporting and research new statistical methods for analyzing biomarkers.
Mouse Models of Human Cancer Consortium Mouse models of human cancers are invaluable, multifaceted tools that enable scientists to investigate the development and behavior of cancer; test new approaches to detection, diagnosis, and imaging; and evaluate prevention and treatment.
To ensure that state-of-the-art techniques and standards are developed to derive and validate mouse models (mice with cancers that mimic the major human cancers that can be inherited), NCI has created the Mouse Models of Human Cancer Consortium (MMHCC).
Composed of 20 multidisciplinary groups of investigators from institutions across the country, the NCI- 20
MMHCC capitalizes on the expertise and judgement of its members to devise and apply innovative technologies to develop, refine, characterize, and validate mouse models.
The consortium approach enables each participating team to pursue its most innovative ideas and experimental approaches while interacting with other member teams to foster the rapid exchange of ideas, information, and technology.
MMHCC participants currently are working to develop and evaluate mouse models for breast, prostate, lung, ovary, skin, blood and lymph system, colon, and brain cancers.
These models will be made available to investigators across the cancer research community.
The MMHCC forum program is the primary form of outreach for the Consortium.
It is used to sustain discovery in all aspects of cancer research by engaging broad community perspectives about the design and application of mouse models through think tanks, discussion groups, task forces, and focus groups.
For example: § The Leukemia and Lymphoma Models Focus Group has been working on standards, common vocabulary, and validation parameters.
§ The Ovarian Models Think Tank developed a priority list for collaborations to derive models where none presently exist and to apply evaluation standards to available models.
§ The MMHCC/Pharma/Biotech Intellectual Property Roundtable is exploring solutions to impediments to productive interactions between the private sector and academic researchers.
§ The Neuro-Oncology Models Forum shares information on the pathology and biology of nervous system tumors and debates priorities for future models.
The Forum developed a response to the NCI Brain Cancer Progress Review Group recommendations on pre-clinical models.
§ The Mouse Models for Prevention Focus Group combines leadership from NCI Intramural researchers and MMHCC investigators to derive mouse models that can inform the search for molecular targets for prevention and support testing of the resulting strategies.
Additional forum meetings planned for the near future include a Cutaneous Malignancies Think Tank; a Small Animal Imaging Forum; a Complex Traits and Genetic Modifiers Forum; a Mouse Models of Pancreatic Ductal Cancer Task Force; a Prostate Cancer Models Focus Group; and a Predictive PreClinical Models Discussion Group.
The Cancer Genome Anatomy Project As normal cells are transformed into cancer cells, their "signatures" change.
Understanding what these changes are and with what genes they are associated will someday enable us to recognize the major steps of tumor development.
To address this need, the NCI Cancer Genome Anatomy Project (CGAP) is combining the newest cost-effective high-throughput technologies to identify all the genes responsible for the establishment and growth of cancer.
Initially, we focused on cells that directly give rise to tumors and placed emphasis on five major types of cancer.
Now with the necessary infrastructure established, we are positioned to examine a wider variety of cancers and to extend our investigations to include cells that play key supporting roles in cancer development.
These include cells that form the tiny blood vessels that feed tumors, cells that metastasize and the tissues that support those metastases, as well as body fluids that might contain early indications of cancer development.
Nearly 41,000 new genes have been discovered through CGAP's main component, the human Tumor Gene Index.
NCI- 21
Many types of cancer are complex genetic diseases.
That is, they result not from changes in a single gene but from the combined, small effects of many genes and the interaction of these genes with environmental, hormonal, and other factors.
An important step toward identifying all of the major genes involved in cancer is detecting the polymorphisms, the variations in a gene sequence that give rise to protein variants or influence the expression of the gene.
NCI recently launched the Genetic Annotation Initiative (GAI), a component of CGAP, to systematically explore and apply technology for the identification and characterization of polymorphisms important in cancer.
The identification of gene variations coupled with the development of laboratory assays to characterize these variations will extend the use of genetic information for improving our understanding of common cancer and its related phenotypes.
Stimulating Technology Development and Application NCI has taken advantage of recent advances to create several programs to support near- and longterm technology development in areas that promise to speed and enable cancer research.
These efforts will be used to move ideas down the pipeline and to seed novel, high-impact technologies.
The potential for some new technologies may take many years to be realized, but work on them must continue now.
To develop and apply technology to advance molecular signatures research, NCI recently created the Innovative Molecular Analysis Technologies (IMAT) program.
This program supports research to develop and carry out pilot applications of instruments, techniques, and analysis tools that can be used to conduct molecular analyses of tumor samples.
For example, the cost-effective, automated tools developed through this program will enable scientists to identify DNA alterations in tumor samples, monitor the expression of genes and their cellular products, determine the function of various cellular proteins, and identify and monitor cellular pathways involved in cancer.
These methods also are being used in high-resolution cellular or molecular imaging research, analysis of tissue samples, development of preclinical models, clinical investigations, and population-based studies for improving our ability to effectively analyze large volumes of samples and data.
More than 80 grants have been awarded through this program.
The IMAT program uses the innovative Phased Innovation Award and Phased Technology Application Award mechanisms.
The first allows expedited review of technology research from the evolution of innovative concepts through feasibility testing and ultimately to full-scale development.
The second fosters the translation of emerging technologies from evaluation to pilot application, speeding the adoption of near-term technological opportunities, once researchers have reached certain negotiated milestones in their projects.
To spur development of daring technologic improvements in cancer treatment and detection in the 21st century, NCI also created the Unconventional Innovations Program (UIP).
The program focuses on stimulating the development of radically new technologies in cancer care that can transform what is now impossible into the realm of the possible for detecting, diagnosing, and intervening in cancer at its earliest stages of development.
Started in 1999, UIP is targeted to invest $48 million over the next 5 years.
UIP does not target incremental improvements to the state of the art in technology but actively recruits NCI- 22
the interest and involvement of investigators from disciplines that have not traditionally received NCI support and encourages these scientists to develop new technologies or make quantum improvements to existing technologies.
Five UIP contracts for "Novel Technologies for Noninvasive Detection, Diagnosis, and Treatment of Cancer" have been awarded to date.
Cancer Surveillance Research Identifying and tracking rates and trends in cancer and monitoring the factors that influence these changes are crucial to our understanding of how to prevent and control cancer.
Our primary means for tracking these trends is the NCI Surveillance, Epidemiology, and End Results (SEER) database.
For over 25 years, SEER has enabled us to identify geographic areas with higher than average rates of cancer, to study patterns and outcomes of cancer care, and to identify risk groups for research and public health intervention.
In FY 2001 NCI substantially expanded the SEER Program to add three states B Louisiana, Kentucky and New Jersey B and the remaining portions of California not already under SEER coverage.
The contracts were awarded through competitive selection and peer review, with emphasis on (1) coverage of populations for which limited data currently exist and (2) data quality that meets SEER standards and reporting requirements.
Overall, SEER coverage will increase from 14 percent to 26 percent of the U.S. population, or from about 35 million to over 65 million people.
For minorities, the SEER expansion increases coverage to 24 percent of African Americans, 44 percent of Hispanics, 42 percent of American Indians and Alaska Natives, and 59 percent of Asian and Pacific Islanders.
Also, during the next three years, NCI staff will work closely with the CDC staff who manage the National Program of Cancer Registries (NPCR) to coordinate parallel implementation of the SEER geographic expansion to increase the number of population-based registries with SEER quality data.
To further explore the causes of cancer, NCI supports epidemiologic studies utilizing the NCI Atlas of Cancer Mortality in United States, 1950 -1994 and other population-based data systems on cancer incidence.
The study of geographic variation of cancer rates as identified through data systems such as the Cancer Atlas assist researchers in developing hypotheses about the role of lifestyle and other environmental factors that affect cancer risk.
NCI also plans to support research initiatives that use geospatial, mapping, and other analytical methods applied to existing population-based data systems of environmental and sociocultural risk factors to develop hypotheses for more in-depth studies of cancer causation.
In addition, NCI is working with public and private partners to build a comprehensive and integrated surveillance system to monitor tobacco control progress at the local, regional, and national levels.
Through the Tobacco Use Supplements to the Current Population Surveys, the Census Bureau made final data from the 1990s available in the Winter of 2001 as a public use data resource.
NCI will provide supplements to existing tobacco control grants to encourage researches to analyze these data.
Drug Discovery Activities Because academic institutions commonly lack the capacity to develop drugs, promising ideas and novel treatment interventions often cannot move forward in the drug discovery process.
The Rapid Access to Intervention Development (RAID) program is designed to place NCI's drug development resources at NCI- 23
the service of investigators with molecules that hold promise for cancer treatment and facilitate movement of new discovery into the clinic.
By providing the resources needed for preclinical development of drugs and biological agents, this program removes the most common barriers between laboratory discovery and clinical testing.
Unlike other NCI drug-discovery programs, products developed through the RAID program are returned directly to the originating laboratory for clinical trial testing.
Fourteen projects have been funded over the past two years through this program.
While RAID focuses on cancer treatment, the Rapid Access to Preventive Intervention Development (RAPID) program provides funding and resources to scientists working to develop agents to prevent, reverse, or delay cancer development.
Like RAID, RAPID is designed to quickly move novel preventive molecules and concepts from the laboratory to the clinic for efficacy testing in clinical trials.
RAPID will accelerate the development process for preventive agents by providing investigators with the contract resources needed for preclinical and early clinical drug development, ensuring the efficient translation of promising discoveries even when investigators and their institutions lack the requisite development capacity or clinical expertise.
To date, seven projects have been funded through this program.
There are many steps involved in turning a potential anti-cancer agent into a "drug" appropriate for human use.
Following initial discovery, efficiency testing and optimization, lead agents must undergo a series of rigorous evaluations that culminate with a clinical trial.
As a result, drug discovery can take years and an investment of several million dollars.
To encourage and support the participation of small businesses in this process, NCI has established the Flexible System to Advance Innovative Research (FLAIR).
FLAIR will expedite cancer therapeutic development by small businesses by providing the budgets and time required to support research at all stages of drug and vaccine development.
Clinical Trials To ensure that a national cancer clinical trials program is poised to address the most important medical and scientific questions in prevention and treatment quickly and effectively requires state-of-the-art approaches and support systems.
These must be coupled with an outreach program that ensures communication, education, and access for all populations who can benefit from clinical trials.
To ensure that all these requirements are met, NCI has been restructuring and reorganizing its system of cancer clinical trials.
These efforts are designed to ensure that the most promising laboratory results are quickly identified and tested and that proposals for major clinical trials involving 1,000 patients or more (Phase III trials) are not only reviewed but prioritized.
Considerable effort has also been made to increase the accessibility of clinical trials.
These include establishing payer and provider partnerships and agreements with federal government departments and health plan providers for covering the costs of clinical trials; promoting coverage for Medicare recipients; and developing educational materials for physicians and patients.
In addition, NCI continues to expand the role of its new Cancer Trials Support Unit in reducing the administrative requirements for conducting clinical research and increasing access to clinical trials for patients and physicians.
Initiated in 1999 as a pilot project, the Cancer Trials Support Unit will NCI- 24
introduce a remote-entry data collection system in 2001 to help streamline information collection and reporting.
In another pilot project, NCI introduced a central Institutional Review Board (IRB) in the spring of 2000 to review the patient protections planned for selected multi-center clinical trials.
If its efforts to reduce the administrative burden on participating institutions and ensure that patients are fully informed of the risks and benefits of participating in clinical trials prove successful, the role of the central IRB is expected to gradually expand until it encompasses all multi-center cancer clinical trials.
Bioinformatics To support the information collection and sharing needs of an array of research programs both current and planned, NCI continues to build its cancer information infrastructure.
Using the rich and diverse collection of data generated through the various components of the Cancer Genome Anatomy Project, NCI has created an integrated model of cancer-related genomic data and developed a Web portal that permits researchers to explore CGAP data for information such as gene expression patterns in different tissue types or gene variants in the population.
NCI has also developed and implemented a modular computer program that assists in the rapid development, deployment, integration, and maintenance of NCI initiative-specific Web sites.
This program has been used to deploy the prototype Web sites for the CGAP portal, the Mouse Models of Human Cancer Consortium, and the Director's Challenge.
In support of the CGAP Web portal, NCI also has developed a prototype for an open source-based informatics architecture that facilitates the retrieval and integration of data distributed among multiple, independent data sources.
Users are provided with the program code, allowing them to modify it at a fundamental level.
This kind of effort must be ongoing for our research efforts to keep pace with the changing world of informatics.
AIDS Research More than 30 percent of all AIDS patients develop some form of cancer during the course of their illness, such as Kaposi's sarcoma, non-Hodgkin's lymphoma, and cervical or anal cancer.
In its commitment to combating AIDS-related cancers, the National Cancer Institute ranks second among the NIH Institutes in its funding of AIDS research, following only the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases.
The NCI's programs of intramural and extramural research encompass basic research on HIV and other retroviruses associated with cancer, developing and testing vaccines, and specific AIDS-related cancers and their treatment.
In addition to its direct support of research, the NCI also provides funding for vital research resources, such as the development of animal models of AIDS and the collection of tissue samples from AIDS-related cancers.
To coordinate clinical testing, the NCI also supports the AIDS Malignancy Consortium, a group of investigators conducting clinical trials on AIDS-related cancers at 15 sites around the country.
INNOVATIONS IN M ANAGEMENT AND ADMINISTRATION Cancer research and administration have continued to benefit from the adoption of Internet technologies.
However, this year's featured innovations also reflect modern management demands which seek to streamline or eliminate paperwork, ensure accountability through results-based management, and address crucial recruitment and retention efforts.
NCI- 25
External Review of NCI Business and Administrative Units NCI is developing a process for conducting external reviews for each of its business and administrative units on a 4-year cycle.
We seek to ensure accountability for our major management goals: (A) to facilitate the elimination of cancer ­ giving our customers what they need, when they need it; and (B) to be prudent and effective stewards of public funds.
The review will examine how each unit focuses on results, fosters innovation, partners with scientists, balances the need for results with the demands of stewardship, and manages resources effectively.
A former New Zealand Cabinet Minister, a pioneer in the application of results-based management to government, serves as an advisor to the current administration on this subject.
Expedited Board Concurrence and Early Grant Award Activity In response to NIH's FY2000 GPRA initiatives and in conjunction with the results-based management movement, top-rated grant applications are posted to a secure web site for early review by members of the National Cancer Advisory Board.
Immediately upon a grant's on-line approval by the Board and the relevant Program Director, the Grants Administration Branch sends an "Intent to Pay" letter to the grant applicants, significantly expediting their notification.
Some of these grants are then awarded with start dates earlier than originally requested, accelerating the progress of the best cancer research efforts.
Institutional Grant Funding Agreement NCI staff spearheaded the proposed NIH Institutional Funding Agreement initiative through which NIH and participating grantees will enter into renewable agreements.
When fully implemented, grantees and NIH staff will process "R01 (snap) type 5" grants electronically.
This will significantly reduce processing time and the cost associated with the grant application process to both the government and grantees.
Information Technology: Network Services and Training Program We continue to enhance IT services to both scientific and management staff.
Through Scientific Storage programs we are addressing the considerable data storage needs of our researchers; work in the areas of genetics and imaging demand significant information resources.
We currently store over 1.5 terabytes of scientific data.
Accompanying this increase in data storage is the implementation of security and performance enhancements for web sites and network operations.
Finally, all staff have access to various computer training opportunities for skills and career enhancement.
An objective is to reduce the number of calls to the NCI help desk through a better-trained workforce, resulting in reduced overall cost to the NCI.
Orientation Program To better integrate our core values, we are changing how NCI welcomes new staff through the creation of a one-day, centralized orientation program.
This program will guide new staff through the organization and familiarize them with important tools.
Special emphasis will be placed on computer training, ethics training, and introduction to key NIH resources.
Recruitment and Retention Study NCI's analysis of its ability to recruit and retain top-caliber scientists provided the basis for an Institutewide pay study.
The ongoing pay study will include a market-based pay comparison analysis of all NCI NCI- 26
positions to assist us in designing a compensation program that will compete effectively with the private sector.
The study will also ensure pay equity through the development of clear guidelines and criteria that reflect industry/academia pay standards.
Additionally, the recruitment/retention analysis resulted in the elimination of some central NIH hiring reviews and the transfer of increased appointment and compensation authorities from NIH to the Institutes.
The goal is to create a streamlined procedure that reduces overhead costs and expedites the appointment process.
Academy for Career Excellence Currently under development, the NCI's Academy for Career Excellence will create an NCI-wide competency-based educational program that (1) provides standardized courses to specific categories of employees; (2) addresses scientific and administrative training needs; (3) recognizes staff training efforts; and (4) reinforces compliance with delegations of authority.
Features will include formal curricula, existing and newly created courses, a web-based course catalog, and a variety of training venues.
The objective is to maintain a trained workforce that maximizes their knowledge as well as to retrain the workforce where necessary to keep up with changing technologies and work requirements.
NIH IntraMall One of the government's first e-commerce efforts, the IntraMall was created and is run by the NCI.
This program and its attendant cost-savings and efficiencies continues to grow.
During Fiscal Year 2000, this initiative was recognized with the National Performance Review's "Hammer Award," the Center of Excellence for Information Technology's "Award for Best Practices in Applications of Information Technology," the Government IT Leadership Award, and the Association of Government Accountants' "Best Practices" award for the implementation of an emerging novel technology in federal, state, or local governments.
NCI- 27
S TORY OF DISCOVERY Targeting Breast Cancer with Herceptin In the ongoing fight against breast cancer, September 25, 1998 stands as an important milestone.
On this date, the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) approved a new drug called Herceptin, as a treatment for late stage breast tumors.
The approval of a new cancer drug always inspires new hope for cancer patients, but Herceptin ­ one of the first drugs to successfully attack cancer at its genetic roots ­ generated an exceptional wave of excitement throughout the cancer community.
Its approval heralded the arrival of a revolutionary new class of drugs that thwart cancer by taking aim at the molecular changes that cause a cell to change from normal to cancerous.
For many women, Herceptin has become a powerful weapon in their struggle against breast cancer.
Laying the Foundation Herceptin's development is grounded in the molecular biology revolution that began about thirty years ago.
Drs. J. Michael Bishop and Harold Varmus, investigators at the University of California /San Francisco back in 1976, were pioneers in showing that cancer is a genetic disease that develops when normal genes that control critical functions in a cell become altered.
These "oncogenes," cause cells to lose some of their normal controls on growth, to multiply recklessly, and develop into a potentially life-threatening tumor.
The Bishop and Varmus Nobel Prize-winning discovery offered scientists an unprecedented glimpse at the true nature of a cancer cell and changed the course of cancer research.
It established a promising, new research path aimed at developing an accurate and detailed picture of the molecular changes that occur during a tumor's development and devising new ways to block or reverse these changes to prevent and treat cancer.
The discovery of oncogenes also launched an ardent search among cancer researchers to identify and isolate specific cancer-associated genes and to determine how their actions cause a normal cell to become cancerous.
One of these investigators was Dr. Dennis Slamon, of the University of California/ Los Angeles.
Slamon's studies, like those of many cancer researchers in the early 1980s, focused on screening tissue for cancer-associated genes.
Researchers surmised that identifying the corrupt cancer genes and their corresponding proteins would provide critical insights into what was going wrong within the cancer cell.
Unlike his colleagues, however, Slamon believed that human tissue ­ not animal tissue or cell lines ­ was the best place to screen for these genes.
To enable his studies, he generated a human tissue bank of cancerous tissue discarded from diagnostic biopsies, in the hope that he might use this tissue someday to screen for altered genes.
Discovery of a Genetic Flaw The process of screening for genes is usually a tedious and time-consuming fishing expedition, particularly in human tissue.
In 1986, however, Slamon's efforts were advanced by several strokes of good fortune.
Through collaboration with the biotechnology company Genentech, Inc., Slamon received several cloned genes that carried the genetic coding for growth factors ­ chemicals in the body that signal cells to grow and divide.
When he tested the cloned genes against tissue samples from his tissue bank, he had a great success: One of the clones, known as the Human Epidermal Growth Receptor No. 2 gene or Her-2/neu, matched genes in certain breast and ovarian tumor samples.
Slamon next needed to confirm that the gene actually plays a role in cancer development.
To answer this question, he and his colleagues studied DNA from breast cancer tissue to determine whether the Her-2/neu gene is altered, and if so, what effect it has on the cell.
They discovered that the gene was changed, causing the affected cells to dramatically "overexpress," or overproduce normal Her-2/neu receptors.
Affected cells become overloaded with signals to grow and divide ­ to become cancerous.
A further review of clinical data revealed that elevated levels of the Her-2/neu receptor protein occurs in 25 to 30 percent of breast cancer cases, and in these cases, the cancer is particularly aggressive.
Women with these tumors have shorter disease-free survival times, relapse more quickly, develop metastases more quickly, are less responsive to traditional treatments, and die more quickly once their cancer is diagnosed.
The Search for a Targeted Treatment Sensing the magnitude of the Her-2/neu discovery, Slamon next focused all of his professional efforts on studying the gene and finding a treatment that targeted its activities.
The Her-2/neu gene encodes a growth factor receptor that helps relay a signal that tells a cell to divide, and because of the receptor's accessible position on the cell surface, it is a prime target for a therapeutic.
He and his colleagues theorized that developing an effective monoclonal antibody would be the quickest route to finding a useful therapeutic.
Monoclonal antibodies, which are engineered in a
NCI- 28
laboratory, possess similar characteristics to naturally occurring antibodies: Both selectively attack a target cell (for example, a virus, bacteria, or cancer cell) by binding to a specific protein, or antigen, on the cell's surface, leaving healthy cells unscathed.
Monoclonal antibody technology offers the opportunity, however, to continuously produce thousands of uniform copies of an antibody targeted to a selected protein.
The researchers began to test a series of monoclonal antibodies engineered to attach to the Her-2/neu protein on the surface of breast cancer cells.
Their efforts paid off when a monoclonal antibody developed by Genentech effectively shut down the Her-2/neu receptor's actions and stopped the growth of cancerous cells in cell culture, without harming normal cells.
This laboratory success confirmed the link between the mutant Her-2/neu gene and an aggressive form of breast cancer and laid the foundation for a revolutionary new therapy for breast cancer.
Yet, the scientists knew that monoclonal antibodies had serious drawbacks that had caused them to fail many times before as potential cancer treatments.
At this time, monoclonal antibodies were difficult and expensive to produce in the large quantities needed.
And, because they were generated in mice, the human immune system often marked them as foreign invaders and destroyed the antibodies before they could reach the cancerous target.
But good fortune was once again with Slamon and his team.
Shortly after the researchers found their effective monoclonal antibody, several biotechnology companies unveiled a new technology that could "humanize" mouse monoclonal antibodies.
Using this new approach, the scientists successfully "humanized" the monoclonal antibody to the Her-2/neu receptor.
This considerable accomplishment readied the monoclonal antibody for clinical tests to determine its safety and effectiveness in humans.
Clinical Trial Testing Clinical trials for Herceptin began in 1990.
Phase I trials showed that the new drug could effectively reach tumors and was relatively nontoxic.
The first Phase II trials produced some positive results for more than half the trial participants and unexpectedly produced complete cancer remission for one woman.
A second Phase II trial tested the Herceptin coupled with the chemotherapy agent, cisplatin, produced similar results.
The Phase III trial included more than 600 women with metastatic breast cancer and excessive Her-2/neu production.
For these women, treatment with Herceptin alone produced encouraging results even for the very aggressive metastatic breast cancer.
Of 222 participants, four percent experienced complete disease remission, 26 percent had partial remission, and 16 percent experienced slowed disease progression and tumor shrinkage.
For more than 25 percent of 469 women treated with Herceptin in combination with chemotherapy, cancer progression had stopped at one year compared to 10 percent of the women treated with chemotherapy alone.
Adding Herceptin to chemotherapy also dramatically increased the number of women who had a partial response or tumor shrinkage compared to chemotherapy treatment alone.
Moreover, Herceptin produced its positive effects without causing several of the common debilitating side effects of hair loss, fatigue, and mouth sores.
The results of the clinical trials demonstrated that, although Herceptin is not likely to cure women with metastatic breast cancer, it can prolong patients' lives and improve their quality of life.
The FDA agreed to give fast-track consideration to Herceptin and in September 1998, approved the drug as a treatment for metastatic breast cancer.
A New Drug Comes of Age The 1998 approval, which came only 12 years after Slamon and his colleagues began to study the Her-2/neu gene, is a testament to good science, serendipity, the dedication of talented researchers and physicians, and the exceptional courage of scores of women who participated in clinical trials.
The drug's favorable effect on breast cancer now has stimulated a number of clinical trials sponsored by the National Cancer Institute (NCI) that are evaluating whether Herceptin combined with other chemotherapies may improve treatment outcomes for other Her-2/neu expressing cancers.
These include gastric, endometrial, salivary gland, prostate, colorectal, ovarian, non-small cell lung, and pancreatic cancers.
NCI also is sponsoring two major studies to test the possibility of adding this agent to standard chemotherapy in earlier stages of breast cancer to enhance survival.
NCI also is supporting studies of other Her2/neu antibodies and other monoclonal antibodies targeted against specific proteins found on cancer cells.
Herceptin's significance extends far beyond its actions as a breast cancer drug.
It represents a new era in cancer prevention and treatment.
With the evolution of molecular biology and the emergence of new technologies, we are gathering remarkable knowledge about the molecular changes that occur during a tumor's development.
We now can exploit this knowledge to develop less toxic and more effective approaches that target these changes to slow, stop, and prevent all types of cancer.
NCI- 29
B UDGET P OLICY The Fiscal Year 2002 budget request for NCI is $4,177,203,000, including funds for AIDS research, an increase of $439,275,000 and 11.8 percent over the FY 2001 level, and $877,585,000 and 26.6 percent over FY 2000.
A five year history of FTEs and Funding Levels for NCI are shown in the graphs below: FTEs by Fiscal Year 3,500 3,000 2,500 2,000 1,500 1,000 500 0 3,150 2,794 2,292 2,393 (Dollars in Millions)
Funding Levels by Fiscal Year 3,245 $4,500 $4,000 $3,500 $3,000 $2,500 $2,000 $1,500 $1,000 $500 $0 $2,306 $3,738 $3,300 $2,657 $4,177
FTEs
1998
1999
2000
2001
2002
Year
1998
1999
2000 Fiscal Year
2001
2002
One of NIH's highest priorities is the funding of medical research through research project grants (RPGs).
Support for RPGs allows NIH to sustain the scientific momentum of investigator-initiated research while providing new research opportunities.
The Fiscal Year 2002 request provides average cost increase for competing RPGs equal to the Biomedical Research and Development Price Index (BRPDI), estimated at 4.3 percent.
Noncompeting RPGs will receive increases of 3 percent on average for recurring costs.
In FY 2002, total RPGs funded will be 4,953 awards, an increase of 516 awards over the FY 2001 estimate, the highest annual total ever awarded by NCI.
Promises for advancement in medical research are dependent on a continuing supply of new investigators with new ideas.
In the Fiscal Year 2002 request, NCI will support 1,600 pre- and postdoctoral trainees in full-time training positions.
An increase of 10 percent over Fiscal Year 2001 levels is provided for stipends and training-related expenses (e.g., health insurance, research supplies and equipment, and travel to scientific meetings).
NCI's many research activities and initiatives require a supporting management and administrative infrastructure which, in large part, is funded through the Research Management and Support (RMS) mechanism.
Since FY 1995, RMS funding has decreased from 5 percent of the budget to 3.6 percent in 2000.
To provide the best balance of needs and resources, NCI's FY 2002 request maintains the RMS funding level at 3.6 percent of the total request, an increase of 11.5 percent.
This funding level supports initiatives that include: · Restructuring and increasing the capacity of our clinical trials program.
· Expanding our ability to support research in cancer imaging techniques that improve early detection, diagnosis, treatment, and prevention of cancer.
· Expanding NCI's informatics infrastructure to enhance information and resource exchange among researchers, clinicians, and the public.
NCI- 30
·
Improving our ability to define, monitor and ultimately help reduce cancer health disparities.
The Fiscal Year 2002 request includes funding for 99 research centers and SPORES, 762 other research grants, and 159 R
The R
The mechanism distribution by dollars and by percent change are displayed below: FY 2002 Budget Mechanism (Dollars in Millions) Other Research - $310 7% Res.
Training - $68 2% R
Research Centers $290 7%
RMS - $152 4%
Research Project Grants - $1,925 46%
Cancer Prev 
FY 2002 Estimate Percent Change from FY 2001 Mechanism
Research Project Grants Research Centers Other Research Research Training R
&
12.5 12.1 8.6 10.0 13.7 10.0 11.5 12.0 15 20
Percents
NCI- 31
NATIONAL INSTITUTES OF HEALTH National Cancer Institute Budget Mechanism FY 2000 Actual Amount FY 2001 Estimate Amount FY 2002 Estimate Amount
MECHANISM Research Grants: Research Projects: Noncompeting Administrative supplements Competing: Renewal New Supplements Subtotal, competing Subtotal, RPGs SBIR/STTR Subtotal, RPGs Research Centers: Specialized/comprehensive Clinical research Biotechnology Comparative medicine Research Centers in Minority Institutions Subtotal, Centers Other Research: Research careers Cancer education Cooperative clinical research Biomedical research support Minority biomedical research support Other Subtotal, Other Research Total Research Grants Training: Individual awards Institutional awards Total, Training Research 
No.
No.
No.
3,101
(266) 354 763
$1,050,107,000 23,721,000
3,176
(327) 405 832 4
$1,167,861,000 25,066,000 179,809,000 261,013,000 1,142,000 441,964,000 1,634,891,000 76,000,000 1,710,891,000 258,658,000 0 0 0 0 258,658,000 52,088,000 19,819,000 159,964,000 0 4,178,000 49,484,000 285,533,000 2,255,082,000
3,414
(330) 385 810 0
$1,370,046,000 26,415,000 180,549,000 263,390,000 0 443,939,000 1,840,400,000 85,120,000 1,925,520,000 289,878,000 0 0 0 0 289,878,000 57,828,000 21,671,000 173,386,000 0 4,638,000 52,562,000 310,085,000 2,525,483,000
158,799,000 233,128,000 2 231,000 1,119 392,158,000 4,220 1,465,986,000 306 67,090,000 4,526 1,533,076,000 82 0 0 0 0 82 317 83 140 0 0 113 653 5,261
1,241 4,417
1,195 4,609
330 4,747
354 4,963
221,351,000 0 0 0 0 221,351,000 42,469,000 16,821,000 144,608,000 0 3,341,000 27,036,000 234,275,000 1,988,702,000
92 0 0 0 0 92 358 82 145 0 0 143 728 5,567
99 0 0 0 0 99 380 86 150 0 0 146 762 5,824
FTTPs 165 1,435 1,600 138 (4) FTEs 1,790 793 211
5,720,000 50,459,000 56,179,000 236,308,000 (406,000) 509,023,000 116,912,000 388,994,000 3,500,000
FTTPs 165 1,435 1,600 151 (4) FTEs 1,908 783 459
6,326,000 55,774,000 62,100,000 261,950,000 (450,000) 563,130,000 136,398,000 456,268,000 3,000,000
FTTPs 165 1,435 1,600 159 (7) FTEs 1,965 807 473
6,959,000 61,351,000 68,310,000 297,825,000 (3,251,000) 619,443,000 152,084,000 511,058,000 3,000,000
2,794
3,299,618,000 (613,954,000)
3,150
3,737,928,000 (673,500,000)
3,245
4,177,203,000 (740,000,000)
NCI- 32
NATIONAL INSTITUTES OF HEALTH National Cancer Institute Budget Authority by Activity (dollars in thousands) ACTIVITY Research: Cancer causation Detection and diagnosis research Treatment research
FY 2000 Actual FTEs Amount
FY 2001 Estimate FTEs Amount
FY 2002 Estimate FTEs Amount
Change FTEs Amount
777 204 818 475
$871,079 228,818 916,147 532,206
734 233 871 522
$888,662 283,147 1,056,913 631,780
771 $1,012,734 240 878 542 316,244 1,155,373 712,256
37 7 7 20
$124,072 33,097 98,460 80,476
Cancer biology
Subtotal, research Resource development: Cancer centers support Research manpower development Construction Subtotal, resource development Cancer prevention and control Total
2,274
2,548,250
2,360
2,860,502
2,431
3,196,607
71
336,105
199 107 3 309 211 2,794
223,430 120,140 3,528 347,098 404,270 3,299,618
215 114 2 331 459 3,150
261,125 139,019 3,011 403,155 474,271 3,737,928
222 117 2 341 473 3,245
292,624 153,427 3,022 449,073 531,523 4,177,203
7 3 0 10 14 95
31,499 14,408 11 45,918 57,252 439,275
Note: Includes FTEs associated with HIV/AIDS research activities.
NCI- 33
NATIONAL INSTITUTES OF HEALTH National Cancer Institute Summary of Changes
2001 Estimated budget authority 2002 Estimated budget authority Net change 2001 Current Estimate Base Budget FTEs Authority
$3,737,928,000 4,177,203,000 439,275,000 Change from Base Budget FTEs Authority
CHANGES A. Built-in: 1.
Intramural research: a.
Within grade increase b. Annualization of January 2001 pay increase c. January 2002 pay increase d.
One day more pay e. Payment for centrally furnished services f. Increased cost of laboratory supplies, materials, and other expenses Subtotal 2.
Research Management and Support: a.
Within grade increase b. Annualization of January 2001 pay increase c. January 2002 pay increase d.
One day more pay e. Payment for centrally furnished services f. Increased cost of laboratory supplies, materials, and other expenses Subtotal 3.
Cancer Prevention and Control: a.
Within grade increase b. Annualization of January 2001 pay increase c. January 2002 pay increase d.
One day more pay e. Payment for centrally furnished services f. Increased cost of laboratory supplies, materials, and other expenses Subtotal Subtotal, Built-in
$203,648,000 203,648,000 203,648,000 203,648,000 120,629,000 238,853,000
$3,727,000 1,891,000 5,520,000 783,000 12,063,000 6,805,000 30,789,000 1,284,000 652,000 1,902,000 269,000 1,644,000 1,418,000 7,169,000 855,000 434,000 1,267,000 180,000 1,778,000 1,860,000 6,374,000 44,332,000
70,189,000 70,189,000 70,189,000 70,189,000 16,441,000 49,768,000
46,733,000 46,733,000 46,733,000 46,733,000 17,775,000 65,299,000
NCI- 34
NATIONAL INSTITUTES OF HEALTH National Cancer Institute Summary of Changes--continued
CHANGES B. Program: 1.
Research project grants: a.
Noncompeting b. Competing c. SBIR/STTR Total 2.
Centers 3.
Other research 4.
Research training 5.
Research and development contracts Subtotal, extramural 6.
Intramural research 7.
Research management and support 8.
Cancer prevention and control 9.
Construction Subtotal, program Total changes
2001 Current Estimate Base No.
Amount
Change from Base No.
Amount
3,176 1,241 330 4,747 92 728 1,600 151
$1,192,927,000 441,964,000 76,000,000 1,710,891,000 258,658,000 285,533,000 62,100,000 261,950,000
238 (46) 24 216 7 34 0 8
$203,534,000 1,975,000 9,120,000 214,629,000 31,220,000 24,552,000 6,210,000 35,875,000 312,486,000 25,524,000 8,517,000 48,416,000 0 394,943,000
FTEs 1,908 783 459 0
563,130,000 0 136,398,000 456,268,000 3,000,000 3,737,928,000
FTEs 57 24 14 0
3,150
95
439,275,000
NCI- 35
NATIONAL INSTITUTES OF HEALTH National Cancer Institute
Budget Authority by Object
FY 2001 Estimate Total compensable workyears: Full-time employment Full-time equivalent of overtime and holiday hours Average ES salary Average GM/GS grade Average Average July 1, Average GM/GS salary salary, grades established by act of 1944 (42 U.S.C. 207) salary of ungraded positions OBJECT CLASSES Personnel Compensation: Full-Time Permanent Other than Full-Time Permanent Other Personnel Compensation Special Personnel Services Payments Total Personnel Compensation Personnel Benefits Benefits for Former Personnel Subtotal, Pay Costs Travel 
FY 2002 Estimate
Increase or Decrease
Percent Change
3,245 13 $133,376 11.2 $65,045 $71,315 $87,105 FY 2002 Estimate $172,332,000 59,689,000 13,312,000 39,704,000 285,037,000 64,496,000 27,000 349,560,000 10,947,000 1,416,000 4,000 7,295,000 11,842,000 4,767,000 19,178,000 170,483,000 339,202,000 79,390,000 303,619,000 3,226,000 7,811,000 0 922,909,000 54,152,000 37,117,000 15,000 0 2,777,165,000 1,000 13,000 0 3,827,643,000 $4,177,203,000
95 0 $3,253 0.0 $2,292 $3,910 $4,775 Increase or Decrease $14,307,000 4,942,000 1,104,000 3,286,000 23,639,000 5,349,000 2,000 28,990,000 904,000 117,000 0 663,000 1,183,000 397,000 2,008,000 16,847,000 55,335,000 4,833,000 33,977,000 274,000 659,000 0 113,933,000 4,577,000 3,287,000 1,000 0 285,223,000 0 0 0 410,285,000 $439,275,000
3.0 0.0 2.5 0.0 3.7 5.8 5.8 Percent Change 9.1 9.0 9.0 9.0 9.0 9.0 8.0 9.0 9.0 9.0 0.0 10.0 11.1 9.1 11.7 11.0 19.5 6.5 12.6 9.3 9.2 0.0 14.1 9.2 9.7 7.1 0.0 11.4 0.0 0.0 0.0 12.0 11.8
11.1 11.3 11.5 11.8 11.9 12.0 13.0 21.0 22.0 23.1 23.2 23.3 24.0 25.1 25.2 25.3 25.4 25.5 25.6 25.7 25.8 25.0 26.0 31.0 32.0 33.0 41.0 42.0 43.0 44.0
NCI- 36
NATIONAL INSTITUTES OF HEALTH National Cancer Institute Salaries and Expenses
OBJECT CLASSES Personnel Compensation: Full-Time Permanent (11.1) Other Than Full-Time Permanent (11.3) Other Personnel Compensation (11.5) Special Personnel Services Payments (11.8) Total Personnel Compensation (11.9) Civilian Personnel Benefits (12.0) Benefits to Former Personnel (13.0) Subtotal, Pay Costs Travel (21.0) Transportation of Things (22.0) Rental Payments to Others (23.2) Communications, Utilities and Miscellaneous Charges (23.3) Printing and Reproduction (24.0) Other Contractual Services: Advisory and Assistance Services (25.1) Other Services (25.2) Purchases from Govt.
Accounts (25.3) Operation 
FY 2001 Estimate $158,025,000 54,747,000 12,208,000 36,418,000 261,398,000 59,147,000 25,000 320,570,000 10,043,000 1,299,000 6,632,000 10,659,000 4,370,000 15,967,000 153,636,000 191,746,000 6,960,000 7,152,000 0 375,461,000 49,011,000 457,475,000 778,045,000
FY 2002 Estimate $172,332,000 59,689,000 13,312,000 39,704,000 285,037,000 64,496,000 27,000 349,560,000 10,947,000 1,416,000 7,295,000 11,842,000 4,767,000 17,875,000 170,483,000 211,376,000 7,737,000 7,811,000 0 415,282,000 53,537,000 505,086,000 854,646,000
Increase or Decrease $14,307,000 4,942,000 1,104,000 3,286,000 23,639,000 5,349,000 2,000 28,990,000 904,000 117,000 663,000 1,183,000 397,000 1,908,000 16,847,000 19,630,000 777,000 659,000 0 39,821,000 4,526,000 47,611,000 76,601,000
NCI- 37
NATIONAL INSTITUTES OF HEALTH National Cancer Institute SIGNIFICANT ITEMS IN HOUSE, SENATE AND CONFERENCE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE REPORTS FY 2001 House Appropriations Committee Report Language (H. Rpt.106-645) Item Bone Disease -- The Committee encourages NCI to study the role of angiogenesis, the growth of new blood vessels, in the metastasis of breast and prostate cancer to the bone through all available mechanisms, as appropriate, including the development of experimental genetic animal models that replicate the process of human cancer metastasis to the bone and exploring why bone is a preferential site for metastases. (p. 57-58) Action taken or to be taken Bone metastasis, or spread of an existing cancer to the bone, is a painful condition that can have a devastating impact on the patient.
Recognizing the very real human suffering this condition causes, the NCI is using a multi-pronged approach to the understanding and treatment of bone metastasis.
Because angiogenesis, or the development of new blood vessels that feed a tumor, is a crucial step in bone metastasis, NCI is conducting and supporting extensive research into the causes of angiogenesis, as well as ways to reverse the process.
Through its research programs, NCI is continuing to expand its understanding of both metastasis and angiogenesis.
Some cancers are particularly likely to spread to the bone.
For example, bone metastasis is a frequent complication of breast and prostate cancer patients.
The process by which tumor cells spread to the bone is complex, involving a complicated interplay between bone and tumor cells.
In a sense, the cancer cells actually conscript the bone to produce chemicals that provide a fertile growth environment for circulating cancer cells.
As the basic mechanisms that drive this intricate process are understood, potential points of intervention will be identified as targets for therapy.
Breast and prostate cancer were two of the first cancers in which the role of angiogenesis in the spread of the tumor and survival of the patient was identified.
In prostate cancer, increases in tumor angiogenesis have been shown to correlate with tumor spread, and many of the tumor-produced substances that promote tumor angiogenesis, such as the vascular stimulatory molecule vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), TGF alpha, and bFGF, are also associated with prostate cancer proliferation, progression, and dissemination.
Researchers have also identified a new class of chemokines that play a pivotal role in tumor progression and angiogenesis.
In breast cancer, researchers have found that human breast cancer cells carried in immunodeficient mice produce a substance called MCP-1.
When the mice are treated with antibodies to MCP-1, survival is extended NCI- 38
and growth of micrometastases is greatly diminished.
Any agent that can inhibit the expression or activity of these tumor-derived substances that promote angiogenesis, or inhibit the proliferation and spread of cancer cells, are strong candidates for potential inhibitors of prostate and breast cancer metastases.
To better understand the basic biological mechanisms that facilitate metastasis to the bone, the NCI has actively encouraged the exchange of information, resources, and model systems between members of the research communities of developmental bone biology and of basic cancer biology.
A workshop entitled "Mechanisms of Tumor Metastasis to the Bone: Challenges and Opportunities" was convened by NCI staff in November, 2000.
The presentations by developmental biologists, cancer cell biologists and clinicians provided a comprehensive picture of the complex extracellular matrix of the bone and identified potential mediators of cancer cell metastasis.
The functional differences between human and mouse bone have complicated the development of a reliable model for skeletal colonization, thus new mouse models need to be designed to facilitate both basic and translational research.
Current therapies for bone metastasis are directed toward pain control but are not effective in disease treatment.
These issues will help focus future planning of research initiatives for the Institute.
Pre-Clinical Research The Mouse Models of Human Cancers Consortium (MMHCC), launched in September 1999, assembles multidisciplinary teams of scientists who are dedicated to the collaborative development, characterization, and validation of mouse models that are analogs of human cancers.
As the MMHCC progresses, NCI will ensure inclusion of additional partners from the academic and private sector research communities through the formation of specialized MMHCC forums.
Each individual forum will have a specific focus, for example, genetic technology, prevention models, or site-specific models.
In response to opportunities raised in the recent workshop on "Mechanisms of Tumor Metastasis to the Bone: Challenges and Opportunities", members of the MMHCC will convene a task force to explore the best mouse-modeling and small animal imaging strategies that capitalize on the knowledge base on human cancer bone metastases.
This task force will be comprised of experts from basic, translational, and clinical research, and will evaluate the most promising and effective approaches to deriving new mouse models of breast, prostate and other cancers that metastasize to bone.
The NCI is supporting new initiatives in drug development based on the progress made over the last decade in our understanding of the biology of cancer cells.
New technology, such as combinatorial chemistry and the miniaturization of assays, will allow for the evaluation of thousands of compounds in a very short time and thereby speed up the process of identifying new candidates for evaluation in clinical trials.
Research areas that suggest opportunities of particular interest include pathways directing apoptosis (programmed cell death), invasion and metastasis, and the multiple molecular components that drive the cell cycle or are responsible for the repair of damaged DNA.
NCI plans to support Interdisciplinary Research Teams (IRT) that will develop new assays, probes, and technologies for molecular target assessment in the development of new agents against specific targets.
NCI will support two or more IRTs focused on the development of mechanism-based assays of NCI- 39
antiangiogenic drug activity.
The teams will consist of interactive groups of investigators with a broad range of experience in basic angiogenesis research, imaging, cell biology, genetics, pharmacology, pathology, animal models and clinical trials to rapidly evaluate potential surrogate markers of antiangiogenic activity.
These studies will include development of new techniques that will allow us to more effectively image the behavior of angiogenic blood vessels in the body.
New array technologies such as "angiochips" will be developed to detect alterations in genes implicated in blood vessel proliferation, in addition to the chip analysis employed to detect genes responsible for angiogenic signals and for the increased affinity of tumor cells for bone or other organs.
New bioassays will be developed for detecting both pro- and anti-angiogenic factors in patients' blood or in tumors.
These new assays will be studied in breast and prostate cancer animal models as well as in proof of principle clinical trials.
Clinical Research NCI-supported researchers are investigating and developing novel products that will block angiogenesis.
NCI is also supporting research to attempt to improve the effectiveness of existing anticancer agents; to develop new agents that inhibit molecular targets or pathways important for the initiation or maintenance of cancer; to develop new agents that inhibit bone invasion by cancer cells; and to develop novel drug delivery systems that target certain organs, such as bone.
Some of this work requires the use of newly created genetic model systems ­ for example transgenic mice that develop prostate or mammary tumors at predictable rates.
To facilitate research into mechanisms of angiogenesis and the development of drugs that target the essential tumor vasculature, NCI recently started the Angiogenesis Resource Center.
It is expected that this resource center will significantly aid in the defining of mechanisms controlling tumor angiogenesis and the development of strategies that can disrupt or abrogate angiogenesis and tumor vascularization in both primary neoplasms and metastases that may arise.
The Angiogenesis Resource Center's web site (http://dtp.nci.nih.gov/aa-resources/aa_index.html) was activated February 2000, and provides information on the resources available and how to access them.
Item Breast Cancer -- The development of advanced imaging technologies including medical infrared imaging derived from the U.S. Military and NASA, and other optical and non-invasive modalities which, when converged with emerging treatments such as angiogenic therapy, can be incorporated into comprehensive systems for the early detection and treatment of breast cancer.
NCI is encouraged to explore this approach to disease management.
(p. 58) Action taken or to be taken NCI endorses the concept that the development of advanced imaging technologies holds vast promise of enhancing the early detection and treatment of all cancers.
The Institute continues to recognize the great potential that imaging technology holds for cancer and identifies it as an area of extraordinary opportunity.
NCI has an array of programs and initiatives aimed at significantly advancing imaging to NCI- 40
more fully exploit its promise for cancer research and care.
For the detection of breast cancer in particular, NCI is funding many areas of advanced technology development.
These areas include: Digital Mammography, Magnetic Resonance Imaging (MRI), Magnetic Resonance Spectroscopy (MRS), Ultrasound Techniques, Positron Emission Tomography (PET), Single Photon Emission Computed Tomography (SPECT), Optical Technologies (emphasizing the use of the near-infrared region of the spectrum), Elastography, Low-Frequency Electrical Impedance Spectroscopic Imaging, and Microwave Imaging .
Digital Mammography is one of the most promising research areas for improving early detection of breast cancer.
Ongoing research in digital mammography includes the development of x-ray source and digital detectors, image optimization and interpretation studies, and studies of impact and cost.
Currently, at least four manufacturers have produced digital mammography units for clinical testing and the FDA has approved one of these as being equivalent to conventional film-screen mammography.
Although equivalence to conventional mammography has been demonstrated, there is a public health need to determine whether digital mammography is better than conventional film-screen mammography, either in detecting more early breast cancers, or in reducing the number of equivocal results or false positive results.
One imaging factor that can be used to estimate a woman's future risk for breast cancer is the density of breast tissue as seen on mammograms.
Increased density indicates a preponderance of glandular tissue over fatty tissue, and appears to be predictive of increased cancer risk.
Current research, including a large study of several hundred women, focuses on developing accurate measures of breast mammographic density and correlation of these measures to breast cancer risk.
NCI also provides support for a project to develop novel mathematical models that build on known physiological and epidemiological characteristics of breast cancer, along with preliminary information about test performance characteristics and costs to estimate the cost-effectiveness of new and emerging imaging technologies, such as MRI and digital mammography.
The NCI has funded a national multi-institutional network for cooperative studies in diagnostic imaging, called American College of Radiology Imaging Network (ACRIN).
For the future, in addition to performing trials originating in academic institutions, this network will develop productive collaborations with industrial sources of new imaging technology and will perform both limited institution pilot studies and full-scale randomized controlled trials to assess the value of imaging innovations in the practice of oncology.
Studies in breast cancer will form an important part of the research agenda of this network, aided by collaborative arrangements with the clinical cooperative groups.
NCI believes that it is important to determine whether digital mammography is better than conventional film-screen mammography, and if it is better, what the advantages are.
ACRIN has developed a protocol to carry out a large-scale trial designed to help make those determinations and in 2001, ACRIN began a trial of 49,000 women who will receive both digital and conventional mammograms for direct comparison.
It is anticipated that the results of this trial will be available within 3 years.
NCI- 41
Although Digital Mammography is a promising research area for improving early detection of breast cancer, there is still the need for a concerted effort to overcome the problems of displaying the digital mammograms so that they are accurately interpretable for diagnosis.
The current soft-copy (i.e., video) display systems remain an impediment to full realization of the potential of digital mammography.
To promote the optimization and interpretation of images from digital mammography systems, NCI issued a Program Announcement (PA) called Development and Testing of Digital Mammography Displays and Workstations.
This PA is intended to advance the state of the art in digital mammography displays and workstation design to facilitate clinical acceptance and implementation of digital mammography for improved breast cancer diagnosis.
The PA will encourage research and development in three critical areas in digital mammography: Softcopy Display Hardware; Workstation Software and Design; and Image Perception.
The first awards involve improvement of monitors, the creation of workstations and their testing in the clinical setting.
Of the 18 applications, four are expected to be funded.
NCI is also supporting a multi-center, international clinical trial on the use of MRI in the detection of breast cancer.
Nearly 600 patients have been accrued at 14 centers in this trial to test MRI as a tool to decrease the number of false-positive x-ray mammograms that lead to biopsy.
NCI is also funding a multi-center trial of breast MRI at six sites as a screening test for breast cancer in women at high-risk for breast cancer.
NCI has funded a 5-year project to test four technologies (MRI-based elasticity imaging, electrical impedance spectroscopy and imaging, microwave spectroscopy and imaging, and near infrared spectroscopy and imaging), which will all be tested in a group of 75 patients arriving for mammography.
This project is focused on determining whether one, or a combination of more than one, of these examinations will significantly improve the detection and diagnosis of breast cancer non-invasively.
Related NCI activities include: $ Exploratory/Developmental Grants for Diagnostic Cancer Imaging: This PA provides support for 2 years of funding at a level adequate for the initial feasibility testing and generation of experimental preliminary data.
This program was initiated in 1997, and was reissued for continuation in 2000.
These grants fund innovative and creative approaches in diagnostic imaging that lead to new avenues of research, and provide investigators with the initial resources required to accomplish pilot testing of ideas.
Since the inception of this ongoing program, 200 applications have been received, and an estimated 53 grants are either currently active.
Of those grants, at least 14 are directly involved with research on breast cancer.
Novel Technologies for Noninvasive Detection, Diagnosis and Treatment of Cancer: The Unconventional Innovations Program (UIP) seeks proposals that represent the highest potential for revolutionary breakthroughs in the development of technologies to enable the non-invasive sensing of cancer signatures in the living body coupled with capabilities for monitored intervention.
These approaches typically carry substantial risk of failing to meet long term objectives.
As a result, the NCI issued this request to demonstrate its commitment to explore these high risk approaches.
The UIP was specifically soliciting projects to develop technology NCI- 42
$
systems or systems components to enable sensing of defined signatures of different cancerous or precancerous cell types or their associated microenvironment in the body in a way that is highly sensitive and specific, yet non-intrusive.
The highest priority was for systems that can either support or provide a seamless interface between sensing/detection and intervention.
Of the five awards that were made in FY 1999, one went to a NASA researcher to develop novel carbon nanotube-based biosensor technology that could lead to detecting molecular signatures of cancer cells, including breast cancer.
Three other awards were more targeted towards breast cancer and use either Near Infrared imaging, a Compton Light Source that produces monochromatic high contrast X-rays, or is developing nano-devices as part of a more complex system to sense (and treat) precancerous or cancerous cells in the breast.
In September 2000, another project was awarded that targets the development and construction of ultrasound systems to detect cancerous tumors, including breast cancer.
$ Development and Application of Imaging in Therapeutic Studies: This initiative, issued in FY 1999, was designed to support research projects addressing the development and application of labeled therapeutic agents as compounds for imaging studies, and/or the development and application of imaging agents as metabolic markers of response to newly-developed therapeutic agents.
Two awards focus on breast cancer.
One project is using SPECT imaging to determine the status of drug-resistance in women, and another is using new MR technologies to assess the status of new blood vessels in tumor models, and their response to therapy.
Small Animal Imaging Resource Programs (SAIRPs): Small animal models, particularly genetically engineered mice, have become essential discovery tools in cancer research.
Small animal imaging techniques are an important tool for providing data about biochemical, genetic or pharmacological processes in vivo, and repetitively in the same animal, without having to sacrifice the animal for analysis.
This program, issued in FY 1999 provides shared imaging research resources to be used by cancer investigators, research related to small animal imaging technology, and training for investigators and technical staff in small animal imaging.
The initiative was reissued and NCI hopes to fund five more SAIRPs.
Although these grants are not focused on a specific type of cancer, the technologies developed will have wide-ranging applications as new animal models, including mouse models of breast cancer, are developed.
In Vivo Cellular and Molecular Imaging Centers (ICMICs) and (Pre-ICMICs): In Vivo Cellular and Molecular Imaging Centers were designed to capitalize on the extraordinary opportunity for studying cancer non-invasively, and in many cases, quantitatively due to recent advances in molecular imaging modalities, and molecular and cellular biology.
The ICMICs and Pre-ICMICs should facilitate the interaction of scientists from a variety of fields to conduct multidisciplinary research on imaging at the cellular and molecular level.
These grants will provide a productive framework within which to expand the capabilities of molecular imaging, which may directly benefit the detection, diagnosis and treatment of breast cancer.
Development of Clinical Imaging Drugs and Enhancers (DCIDE): DCIDE is a competitive program to expedite and facilitate the development of promising imaging enhancers (contrast NCI- 43
$
$
$
agents) or molecular probes from the laboratory to early clinical trials.
This program is modeled on the NCI-funded RAID program that facilitates development of new therapeutic drugs and biologics.
The RAID program will foster the development of target-based therapeutics.
Related imaging agents will be necessary for the resultant target-based clinical trials to determine, non-invasively, where and how the target-based therapeutics are performing in patients.
The DCIDE program is intended to supply missing steps so that promising discoveries can be translated to the research and clinical environments in the absence of development capacity, clinical connections, or industry interest.
The DCIDE program will focus on promising imaging agents that are not otherwise likely to receive an adequate and timely evaluation.
The DCIDE program is not intended by itself to provide full-scale clinical development but will facilitate the performance of clinical trials to establish proof of principle of a compelling hypothesis.
Once this is accomplished for specific products, it is anticipated that clinical development will continue along established lines under the sponsorship of either private companies or the NCI.
Through the DCIDE program, the developer of a promising imaging agent or probe will be given access to the development resources of the NCI to remove the most common barriers between laboratory discoveries and clinical trials.
The DCIDE program was publicly announced in June 2000, and the first requests have been submitted, one of which deals specifically with an imaging agent directed at breast cancer.
Item Childhood Skeletal Malignancies -- . . . .
The Committee encourages NCI to enhance the level of scientific knowledge of Osteosarcoma, Ewings sarcoma, and related malignancies affecting connective tissue that often result in limb loss through all available mechanisms, as appropriate, including a consensus conference to develop a research agenda.
(p. 58) Action taken or to be taken Childhood skeletal malignancy is diagnosed each year in 650-700 children and adolescents younger than 20 years of age.
Osteosarcoma (56 percent) and Ewing's sarcoma (34 percent) account for the majority of these bone tumors.
Through a series of national pediatric clinical trials conducted by the pediatric oncology cooperative groups over the past three decades, the 5-year survival rate has improved such that more than 70 percent of children with newly diagnosed non-metastatic osteosarcoma or Ewing's sarcoma can expect to survive long-term.
Advances in pediatric orthopedic surgery, chemotherapy and radiotherapy have allowed the majority of children with localized disease to undergo limb-sparing procedures as part of their cancer treatment, thus diminishing the long-term impact of their childhood cancer.
Approximately 20-30 percent of children is diagnosed with metastatic bone disease and their survival is 50 percent or less.
Pediatric oncology researchers and the NCI are committed to learning more about the development of bone malignancies and improving the current treatment modalities to ensure increased survival with diminished toxicity.
Similar research activities supported by the NCI and conducted primarily by researchers associated with the Children's Oncology Group (COG) are ongoing for all of the major types of cancer that NCI- 44
develop in children and adolescents.
Basic Science A priority of current research efforts is the identification of the molecular biologic characteristics of a patient's diagnostic tumor material that can be used prospectively to predict the tumor's metastatic potential, therapy responsiveness, and the patient's survival prognosis.
Patients currently treated on COG clinical trials can be enrolled in a companion biology study that investigates drug resistance related genes, tumor suppressor genes and oncogenes, and other molecular biologic characteristics of the tumor.
The goal is to develop a set of biologic prognostic indicators measured at diagnosis that can be used to stratify patients by risk of relapse and to provide a basis for adjustment of treatment intensity.
The NCI is also supporting investigations of the molecular biological features of osteosarcoma tumor response to methotrexate, an important chemotherapeutic component, to determine biological factors that may indicate a tumor's likelihood of response or resistance to methotrexate.
Gene rearrangements in Ewing's family of tumors are being studied as part of the current Ewing's sarcoma treatment protocol to prospectively assess the prognostic importance of specific tumor gene rearrangements and low levels of tumor cells in the bone marrow at diagnosis.
COG investigators are taking advantage of the extraordinary opportunities available through comprehensive molecular analysis technologies that provide the groundwork for changing the basis of tumor classification from morphological to molecular characteristics.
COG researchers successfully competed for 5 years of funding from the "NCI Director's Challenge: Towards a Molecular Classification of Cancer" to use microarray technology to study the gene expression profiles of pediatric sarcomas.
This research will examine the genetic characteristics of bone tumors at diagnosis to predict clinical course, treatment responsiveness and survival outcome based on the tumor's individual genetic profile.
Another area of focus for pre-clinical research is the identification of new treatment approaches for osteosarcoma and Ewing's sarcoma.
Using an osteosarcoma mouse model, investigators are delivering aerosolized formulations directly to the lungs of either active chemotherapy agents or virus vectors producing immune-system activating cytokines.
These studies are designed to determine whether this method of delivering treatment decreases the growth and development of metastatic lung nodules.
Investigators plan to translate this approach into a clinical trial for children with osteosarcoma metastatic to the lungs.
The COG Bone Tumor Committee conducted a scientific symposium on bone sarcoma biology during the November COG meeting.
Clinical Trials For osteosarcoma, the COG recently completed a group-wide, randomized prospective trial that examined the impact on outcome of adding ifosfamide and an immunomodulatory agent, muramyl tripeptide, to standard cisplatin, doxorubicin, and high dose methotrexate therapy.
Results from this study should be received soon.
A nationwide series of pilot studies are now underway to evaluate the use of more intensive alkylator therapy and the adjustment of chemotherapy intensity based on the NCI- 45
degree of histologic necrosis during induction therapy.
A subsequent Phase III study will incorporate the concept of increased therapy for patients with an initially inferior response to induction chemotherapy with the chemotherapy regimen to be determined by results from the current pilot studies.
Additionally, COG has recently completed a Phase II trial of topotecan in patients with metastatic osteosarcoma to determine the activity of this new agent.
From 1995 to 1998 a group-wide randomized clinical trial for children with Ewing's sarcoma that compared conventional chemotherapy versus a regimen of shorter duration including more intensive alkylating agent dosing was conducted.
Results from this study will be reported in the Spring.
A new group-wide randomized trial compares conventional chemotherapy to a regimen using chemotherapy interval compression to increase dose intensity of all active agents.
COG recently completed a trial investigating the role of high-dose chemotherapy and radiation followed by autologous stem cell reconstitution as consolidation for newly diagnosed patients with high-risk metastatic disease.
Results from this study indicate that the high-dose chemotherapy employed did not significantly improve outcome for this high-risk population.
Immunotherapy in the treatment of children with Ewing's sarcoma and the high risk of relapse is being studied using a macrophage activating agent, liposome-encapsulated muramyl dipeptide (ImmTher).
This stimulates the pulmonary immune system to destroy tumor cells.
The biologic response modifier is given to high-risk patients after completion of surgery, chemotherapy, and radiotherapy in an attempt to prolong disease-free survival by enhancing immune surveillance in the most common site of relapse.
As a part of this effort, investigators are exploring the impact of the immunomodulatory therapy on cytokine production, immune cell killing activity and tumor related growth factor levels (VEGF) in the child treated for advanced Ewing's sarcoma.
Numerous Phase I studies are available to children with osteosarcoma and Ewing's sarcoma whose tumors have recurred despite standard therapy.
Agents under evaluation are gemcitabine, continuous infusion topotecan, vinorelbine, docetaxel, dolostatin, irinotecan/cisplatin combination therapy, fenretinide, and ET-743.
Phase I trials of molecularly targeted agents ZD1839 (EGF receptor) and SU6668 (VEGF receptor inhibitor) will open in the coming year.
A planning meeting for future clinical trials in osteosarcoma was held during the American Pediatric Hematology and Oncology meeting in September.
In addition, the COG Bone Tumor Committee met in November to discuss clinical research plans for bone tumors.
While children with these tumors have benefited from the historically high level of participation in clinical trials, the gains in survival outcome by adolescents and young adults with malignancies such as osteosarcoma and Ewing's sarcoma has been less dramatic.
COG and the NCI have begun an Adolescent-Young Adult (AYA) Initiative to increase clinical trial participation by this patient population.
A first step of the initiative has been to extend the age eligibility for COG osteosarcoma and Ewing's sarcoma clinical trials to 50 years and allow the adult cooperative groups to enroll their patients with bone malignancy.
NCI- 46
Identifying Causes of Cancer in Children The NCI is currently supporting planning and pilot studies to evaluate the feasibility of developing a central registry of cancer cases occurring among children in the United States; building upon the patient population presented to COG institutions.
The primary objective in establishing a central registry of childhood cancer cases would be to establish a resource to support and facilitate the conduct of scientific studies of the highest merit and identify environmental and other causes of childhood cancer.
A national effort and resource is essential.
Single institutions or even consortia of institutions within a limited geographic region see insufficient numbers of cases of childhood cancer to mount definitive studies.
Long-Term Effects of Therapy The NCI supports research activities to improve the health status of survivors of childhood cancer.
The NCI-supported Childhood Cancer Survivorship Study (CCSS) has established a cohort of 14,000 survivors of childhood cancer who were initially treated between 1970 and 1986.
The CCSS cohort includes 957 5-year survivors of osteosarcoma and 560 5-year survivors of Ewing's sarcoma.
The CCSS is ascertaining key outcomes that are important to survivors of childhood cancer, including heart and lung problems related to their cancer therapy, fertility, health status of offspring, and risk of second cancers.
Information from the CCSS can be used to advise survivors of appropriate health-related behaviors and can be used to identify the need for new treatments to avoid deleterious long-term consequences of therapy.
The CCSS, initially funded in 1993, is currently in its second 5-year period of funding and continues its important monitoring and research activities for the childhood cancer survivors.
Recent Accomplishments In the past year, NCI intramural investigators have reported that individuals with Ewing's sarcoma were more likely to have inguinal hernia than those without the cancer.
This suggests a disruption in normal embryological development; possibly due to genetic susceptibility or intrauterine exposure, such as viral infection.
To further explore this, we are evaluating the possibility of viral infections as a risk factor for Ewing's sarcoma.
Also being evaluated is the occupational exposures of parents of individuals who develop Ewing's sarcoma.
NCI intramural investigators have recently collected new information from a group of patients who have survived retinoblastoma.
They continue to demonstrate an excess of bone sarcoma, predominantly osteosarcoma, soft tissue sarcomas, and melanoma.
We are clinically evaluating the families of the patients with melanoma, who often have sarcomas, to try to detect clinical or genetic markers that could predict risk of second cancers.
These patients also have a high frequency of leiomyosarcomas which occur in blood vessels, the gastrointestinal tract, or the uterus.
We hope to genotype the individuals with second cancers, to evaluate whether specific variations in the retinoblastoma gene predict risk of second sarcomas or melanoma.
NCI- 47
Item DES Education -- . . . .
The Committee urges NCI to review this plan within a reasonable timeframe and collaborate with CDC on its implementation.
The Committee also urges NCI to ensure that public information pamphlets developed by NCI are readily made available to consumers.
(p. 58) Action taken or to be taken NCI and CDC are collaborating to develop a national campaign to inform American women about the potential health effects associated with Diethylstilbestrol (DES) exposure.
Focus groups are being conducted to determine informational and supportive needs.
Using information from the focus groups, communication materials will be developed and tested, and in FY 2002, the campaign will be launched with materials disseminated through CDC's networks and NCI's Cancer Information Service to health care professionals, advocacy groups and the public.
DES National Education Campaign: Prescribed for pregnant women to prevent miscarriages, DES, a synthetic estrogen, was subsequently linked to increased risks of cancer, genital abnormalities, and/or compromised fertility.
Pregnant women who took the drug between 1938 and 1971, and their children, are at risk--an estimated 5 to 10 million individuals.
Although previous DES educational efforts have reached many persons exposed to DES, the knowledge most people have about DES is old and inaccurate.
Neither patients nor their health care providers have current information about DES health risks--indicating a need for ongoing screening and health monitoring.
The DES National Education Campaign is designed to fill the knowledge gap by targeting audiences who are predisposed to learning about DES: persons who are aware of their DES exposure status, but are unaware of on-going and new risks; individuals who are unaware of their exposure status, but are experiencing symptoms consistent with DES; persons within the age cohort of DES exposed who are active health-information-seekers; and health care providers who treat DES exposed patients.
The campaign employs a "push-pull" strategy, educating patients and providers simultaneously, so that informed consumers will find up-to-date and motivated providers to monitor their health.
The campaign will integrate DES education into on-going and sustainable channels and institutions.
Plans include incorporating DES messages into educational materials distributed to persons concerned about associated symptoms such as breast cancer and infertility.
The DES National Campaign has partnered with health care professional organizations and patient advocacy groups to develop links between campaign efforts and existing forums for health education.
The national campaign will complement traditional educational channels with new electronic media.
Campaign evaluation will monitor message penetration, measure the integrated impact of provider and patient campaigns, and use assessment information to take action necessary to maximize campaign influence.
The campaign calls for careful integration of research, campaign design, and assessment to determine the most effective and efficient means of reaching affected individuals.
NCI- 48
DES Workshop NCI held a workshop at NIH in July 1999 (DES Research Update 1999, Current Knowledge, Future Directions) as a follow-up to a workshop held in 1992 (NIH Workshop on Long-Term Effects of Exposure to Diethylstilbestrol).
The 2-day workshop involved about 175 participants, including academic researchers, government scientists (from NCI, NIEHS, and other NIH Institutes and Offices, the CDC, and the DHHS Office on Women's Health), and DES advocates and organizations.
The purpose of the meeting was to disseminate information acquired from ongoing DES projects, to evaluate activities and achievements associated with recommendations from the previous workshop, to identify unmet research and data needs, and to discuss potential opportunities for further research.
The agenda included overview sessions on basic laboratory research, epidemiological studies, clinical research, and education and outreach research and activities focused on DES.
Breakout sessions in these areas included discussions of the current and future needs for DES-related research and recommendations for addressing those needs.
A poster session provided an opportunity to discuss recent research findings and also encouraged the participation of younger researchers.
The proceedings of the workshop have been published and are currently available through the Cancer Information Service (1-800-4CANCER).
The complete text of the proceedings is available online at: http://osp.nci.nih.gov/whealth/DES/index.html.
NCI hosts and maintains a website for the medical and lay community to access current information on the health status of DES-exposed mothers, daughters and sons.
The website contains helpful hints on talking about DES, which serves as a useful resource for families exposed to DES.
The DES publication website is located at: http://dccps.nci.nih.gov/ASRB/pubs/DES_Pubs/directory.html.
Item Endometrial and Cervical Cancer -- The Committee encourages NCI to conduct a programmatic review of the research portfolios in endometrial and cervical cancer and enhance research in areas of discovery that are not currently being funded through all available mechanisms, as appropriate, including requests for applications for SPOREs. (p. 58) Action taken or to be taken In May 2000, NCI, together with DoD, the PHS Office of Women's Health, the NIH Office of Research on Women's Health, the Gynecologic Oncology Group, and the Society of Gynecologic Oncologists, sponsored a retreat on translational research in gynecologic cancer.
This 3-day meeting, attended by more than 150 scientists, clinical researchers, and federal program staff, identified areas of scientific opportunity in gynecologic cancer.
NCI established a Progress Review Group (PRG) in early FY 2001to assist in setting long-term priorities for research on gynocological cancers, including endometrial, cervical, and ovarian cancers.
Like other review groups, this group is composed of between 20 and 30 prominent members of the scientific, medical, industry, and advocacy communities who are charged with outlining and prioritizing a NCI- 49
national research agenda for a particular cancer site.
Using the NCI's current research program as a baseline, the PRG will identify priority areas for research and will issue a final report listing research priorities and resource needs.
This report is scheduled for completion by the end of FY 2001and NCI will develop an implementation plan by mid FY 2002.
The NCI also recognizes the need to enhance translational research in endometrial and cervical cancers.
It is the intent of the NCI to continue to support multidisciplinary translational research on gynecological cancers including those of the endometrium and cervix.
Applications for gynecological cancer SPOREs will be accepted for February 1, 2003.
Applicants will have an opportunity to resubmit applications every February 1st of each year after this first submission date in 2003.
Awards will be made based on the scientific merit of the applications and the availability of funds to the SPORE program.
Item Esophageal and Stomach Cancer - - Approximately 34,000 Americans will be diagnosed this year with esophageal or stomach cancer and approximately 25,000 will die from these diseases.
Both cancers disproportionately affect minority populations, particularly African-Americans and Hispanics.
The Committee encourages NCI, in collaboration with NIDDK, to enhance efforts in this area.
(p. 58) Action taken or to be taken There has been an increase in these tumors and the discovery of interrelationships among gastroespohageal reflux disease, Barrett's esophagus, and adenocarcinoma of the lower esophagus.
Thus, NCI has initiated a series of meetings with leading gastroenterology professional groups (e.g., American Gastroenterology Association, American College of Gastroenterology) and the National Institutes of Diabetes and Digestive Diseases (NIDDK), to begin several important activities.
First, an NCI-NIDDK Barrett's Working Group has been formed and is reviewing both Institutes' research portfolios relating to Barrett's-associated cancer etiology, prevention, and treatment.
The Working Group will consider what is known about the risk factors, what is still unknown, and what research is indicated.
Following this review, we have scheduled a series of meetings to examine research opportunities and obstacles, and to stimulate targeted funding initiatives.
In September 2000, NCI participated in an Interagency Coordinating Committee Meeting on Barrett's Esophagus that included representatives from NIDDK (lead), the Veteran's Administration, Department of Defense, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, and Federal Drug Administration.
Discussed was a full-scale workshop out of which initiatives in this area could be developed.
The utility of an awareness/education program was also discussed.
This activity is a prelude to a formal NCI-initiated Progress Review Group (PRG) focused specifically on esophageal and stomach cancer scheduled for Fall 2001 and charged with assisting in the setting of priorities for research on stomach and esophageal cancers.
Like other PRGs, such as those already convened for prostate, breast, colorectal and brain cancers, this PRG will be composed of 20-30 prominent members of the scientific, medical, industry, and advocacy communities who are charged with outlining and prioritizing a national research agenda for a particular cancer site.
Using the NCI's NCI- 50
current research program as a baseline, the PRG will identify priority areas for research and will issue a final report listing research priorities and resource needs.
The report is scheduled for completion in 2002.
Item Lung Cancer Screening --. . . .
The Committee encourages NCI to examine these technologies and their usefulness in early diagnosis and patient treatment.
(p. 58) Action taken or to be taken Lung cancer is the most common cause of cancer death among men and women.
Historical data suggests that patients with surgical early Stage I disease may have 10 year survivals up to 80 percent.
This has formed the rationale for early lung cancer detection programs.
Observational trials in the United States and Japan using low dose helical computed tomography (ct) have shown promising results with the detection of early stage disease.
These data have been interpreted to suggest great potential for realizing surgical cure and reducing lung cancer-specific mortality.
NCI provided funding for the Early Lung Cancer Action Project (ELCAP) trial at Weill Cornell Medical School, and is currently funding another, larger observational trial at Mayo Clinic.
It remains to be seen whether these outcomes represent true mortality reductions or are merely the expression of lead-time, length, and over-diagnosis biases inherent in screening.
Lead-time bias is the apparent improved survival that results from detecting a cancer earlier and does not necessarily mean that the individual's overall life span has been increased.
Length bias is the apparent improved survival that occurs if screening preferentially detects slow-growing, non-aggressive cancers.
Many experts believe that a randomized, controlled trial is necessary to answer these questions.
The NCI-funded Prostate, Lung, Colorectal and Ovarian (PLCO) study is currently determining whether a randomized, controlled study is possible.
The issue is whether high-risk individuals will agree to participate in a randomized controlled study where the experimental group receives screening with spiral CT studies and the control group receives screening with routine chest films.
In parallel with the investigation of contemporary image-based screening methods, modern techniques have made it possible to detect biomarkers in extraordinarily small quantities from blood, sputum, urine, and tumor tissue.
Some biomarkers appear to predate the clinical presentation or diagnosis of lung cancer, providing the opportunity to halt or reverse the progression to overt malignancy with life-style modifications, chemoprevention, or molecularly targeted therapy.
Tissue and other specimens obtained from high risk individuals undergoing lung cancer screening would provide a valuable bank from which to apply and validate biomarkers that may be useful in other pilot projects.
The ultimate goal is to identify biomarkers to enable in the prediction of lung cancer and the definition of high-risk cohorts in whom prevention and intervention are appropriate.
Based on those reasons above, the NCI-funded American College of Radiology Imaging Network (ACRIN) will begin a multi-center, randomized controlled trial of 7,000 individuals at high risk for lung NCI- 51
cancer to determine: whether lung cancer screening with low-dose helical CT reduces lung cancerspecific mortality, and to develop a tissue bank from individuals with pathologically-proven lung cancer that can be used to test biomarkers for lung cancer.
ACRIN will collaborate with the NCI-funded lung SPORE programs, and the Early Detection Research Network (EDRN), to develop the biorepository aspect of the randomized spiral CT study.
NCI also issued an RFA in FY 2000 to create a database of spiral CT studies as a research resource for the entire research community.
Fifteen applications were received and will be reviewed shortly.
It is anticipated that a consortium of approximately five institutions will be created from these applications.
The consortium will define guidelines for creating, populating and accessing the database, which will be publicly available over the Internet.
The resources would be used by investigators to develop software programs that can automatically find abnormalities or assess their likelihood of malignancy.
NCI also supports several individual projects related to the interpretation or evaluation of lung cancer spiral CT screening studies.
Item Lymphoma -- The Committee understands that NCI is committed to conducting a progress review group on lymphoma.
This will give NCI and other Federal agencies the opportunity to evaluate current research and determine future needs.
The Committee requests that the Director of the Institute be prepared to provide a progress report at the fiscal year 2002 appropriations hearing.
(p. 58-59) Action taken or to be taken In August 2001, NCI established a Progress Review Group (PRG) to assist in setting long-term priorities for research on leukemia, lymphoma, and myeloma cancers.
Like other PRGs, this one is composed of between 20 and 30 prominent members of the scientific, medical, industry, and advocacy communities who are charged with outlining and prioritizing a national research agenda for a particular cancer site.
Using the NCI's current research program as a baseline, the PRG is identifying priority areas for research and will issue a final report listing research priorities and resource needs.
This report is scheduled for completion by the spring of 2001 and NCI will develop an implementation play by the end of FY 2001.
Lymphomas are cancers that develop in the immune system, the part of the body that protects us from cancer and infection.
The immune system includes the bone marrow, spleen, thymus, lymph nodes, and a network of thin tubes that carry lymph and white blood cells.
These tissues and organs produce the white blood cells that fight infection and cancer.
Lymph nodes are filters that stop infectious agents from spreading and are located in key locations such as the intestine and the lungs.
Therefore, when lymphoma occurs, it develops in the very system designed to protect us against disease.
There are two major types of lymphoma -- Hodgkins's lymphoma and non-Hodgkin's lymphoma.
Hodgkin's lymphoma (also called Hodgkin's disease) is an uncommon lymphoma which accounts for
NCI- 52
less than one percent of all cases of cancer in the U.S.
Both types of lymphomas can occur in adults and children.
Both Hodgkin's disease and non-Hodgkin's lymphoma occur with increased frequency among persons infected with the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), the virus that causes AIDS.
In particular, the intermediate- and high-grade types of non-Hodgkin's lymphoma are more common among persons with HIV/AIDS.
In HIV-infected patients, about one -half of all B-cell lymphomas are associated with the Epstein-Barr virus, including virtually all primary central nervous system lymphomas in patients with AIDS.
Additionally, the human T-lymphotropic virus 1 is associated with lymphomas and leukemias.
Hepatitis C virus is associated with a particular type of lymphoma, mucosa-associated lymphoid tissue (MALT) lymphoma of the gastrointestinal tract.
Decreased immune function, whether it results from exposure to certain viruses or from other exposures, clearly puts some people at higher risk than others.
While it is hoped that understanding the demographics and trends of lymphoma will suggest clues to the etiology of the cancers, identifying causes and risk factors associated with lymphomas has remained a formidable challenge to investigators.
This is due, at least in part, to the fact that the various sub-types of these tumors behave differently from one another.
With the observed increasing incidence rates in the U.S. Population, lymphoma research that examines the role of environmental factors is of particular interest to the Institute.
For example, herbicides and other chemicals may increase the risk of these diseases.
NCI's Surveillance of Lymphoma Taken together, Hodgkin's disease and non-Hodgkin's lymphoma are the fifth most common type of cancer diagnosed and the sixth most common cause of cancer death in the U.S. Whereas most cancer rates have been declining in the 1990's, rates for lymphoma have risen for reasons that are not clear.
The magnitude of the burden imposed by lymphoma and trends in this burden are being tracked by the NCI's Surveillance, Epidemiology and End Results (SEER) Program.
Non-Hodgkin's lymphoma is much more common with 54,900 cases diagnosed in 2000 as compared to 7,400 cases of Hodgkin's disease.
The 1-year survival rates for Hodgkin's disease and non-Hodgkin's lymphoma are 93 percent and 70 percent, respectively, with 5-year survival rates 82 percent and 51 percent, respectively.
An estimated 27,500 Americans died of lymphoma in 2000.
NCI Sponsored Research on Lymphoma NCI supports a large research project portfolio related to lymphoma comprised of over 400 individual projects, totaling over an estimated $82 million for lymphoma, Hodgkin's and non-Hodgkin's, research in FY 2000.
In addition NCI sponsors a very large number of lymphoma cancer clinical trials by grants to individual investigators in hospitals and academic institutions, by grants to cancer centers and large multi-center research consortia, by collaboration with pharmaceutical and biotechnology firms, and within its intramural programs.
There are currently 436 clinical trials in lymphoma of which 299 are NCI sponsored.
NCI- 53
NCI's scientific investment in cancer genetics has already paid huge dividends.
The Cancer Genome Anatomy Project (CGAP) has resulted in the cataloging of tens of thousands of human and mouse genes.
New technologies have permitted scientists to determine which genes are expressed (active) in normal and cancerous tissues.
There has been an exponential increase in the pace of identifying genes that maintain the integrity of our genetic material, regulate cell growth and development, and determine our response to hormones and other chemicals produced by the body as well as environmental agents.
Related discoveries have enabled us to characterize the function of hundreds of new genes and pathways.
Vast public databases contain millions of entries describing gene sequences, their expression in different tissue types, and their location in the human genome.
NCI has a concerted effort underway to understand the genetic basis of lymphoma.
Currently, there are four cDNA libraries in CGAP from lymphoma and three from normal lymph node tissue.
Although one of CGAP's aims is to discover genes important to our understanding of cancer development, an important outcome has been the rapid rate of contribution by CGAP to gene discovery overall.
CGAP is currently the prime depositor of sequences into the public Expressed Sequence Tag (EST) database.
Sequencing from lymphoma and normal lymph node libraries has generated over 62,000 sequences representing nearly 14,000 genes.
Sequences from nearly 1,200 unknown unique genes from lymphoma have been entered into the CGAP database.
The CGAP database is a unique resource that allows scientists to develop tools to perform large-scale genomic analyses to characterize tumors genetically.
This genetic characterization can help explain why patients diagnosed with the same cancer differ dramatically in their responses to treatment.
For example, a collaboration of scientists (including NCI scientists) genetically analyzed diffuse large B-cell lymphoma, an aggressive cancer that is the most common type of non-Hodgkin's lymphoma.
For 40 percent of patients with this diagnosis, standard multi-agent chemotherapy is curative.
A compelling clinical problem is to understand why the remaining 60 percent of patients succumb to this disease despite chemotherapy.
Reasoning that the varying therapeutic responses of patients with diffuse large B-cell lymphoma are due to undefined molecular differences in their tumors, DNA microarray technology was used to define the gene expression profiles of diffuse large B-cell lymphoma samples on a genomic scale.
This new technology is capable of measuring the activity of tens of thousands of genes at the same time, thus creating a molecular portrait of the cells being studied.
For this study, the CGAP was used to create a specialized DNA microarray, the Lymphochip, that is enriched in genes that function in normal and malignant lymphocytes.
Lymphochip microarray analysis of gene expression in diffuse large B-cell lymphoma samples revealed that this single diagnosis actually contains two different diseases that differ in the expression of hundreds of genes.
The two types of diffuse large B-cell lymphoma that were discovered each resemble a different type of normal B lymphocyte, suggesting that these cancers have distinct cellular origins.
Clinically, patients with these two types of diffuse large B-cell lymphoma had strikingly different responses to chemotherapy.
Patients with one lymphoma subtype, termed germinal center B-like diffuse large B-cell lymphoma, had a favorable prognosis: 75 percent of these patients were cured by chemotherapy.
Patients with the other lymphoma subtype, termed activated B-like diffuse large B-cell lymphoma, had a poor response to NCI- 54
chemotherapy with less than one quarter of these patients achieving a long term remission.
This study provides a clear demonstration that genomic-scale gene expression analysis can define clinically important subtypes of human cancer.
In the future, such gene expression profiling of cancer cells will be used to guide patients towards therapies that are tailored for their particular diseases.
At the molecular level the genetic lesions associated with or contributing to the etiology of lymphoma are chromosomal translocations causing aberrant patterns of proto-oncogenes normally expressed, or the expression of proto-oncogenes not normally expressed, in lymphoid cells.
These genes are generally in the family of transcription factors, which are proteins required for gene expression.
In addition, scientists also have identified a unique family of proteins, which suppress programmed cell death, or apoptosis, and contributes to the development of some lymphomas.
The aims of NCI's research projects are highly diverse and are designed to understand the molecular lesions relevant to the pathogenesis of lymphomas; understand the role of Epstein-Barr virus in malignant diseases; develop potentially novel approaches to cancer therapy by targeting viral genes or genetic abnormalities; develop chemotherapeutic regimens designed to achieve cure in patients with lymphomas, while minimizing toxicity; define risk groups using clinical and biological parameters; and promote the utilization of the overall expertise in lymphoid malignancies at NCI for the benefit of patients with lymphomas.
The NCI has supported and continues to support many basic and clinical research programs that are attempting to better characterize the immunology and biology of lymphomas, and to increase the potential for cure of these patients.
Studies in non-Hodgkin's lymphoma have suggested that a defect in programmed cell death, or apoptosis, is critical to the development of lymphomas.
An increasing number of genes related to this process have been identified.
Another component of the research portfolio is the viral etiology and biology of lymphoid malignancies in humans.
Current research focuses on understanding the role of viral genes in the initiation and progression of viral-associated lymphomas to provide the basis for future investigations on treatment strategies.
Specifically, NCI supports basic research on both human and animal DNA and RNA containing viruses that are known etiologic factors and/or cofactors in the initiation and progression of lymphoid malignancies.
One reason for the rising rates of lymphomas has been the HIV/AIDS epidemic.
A new Program Announcement in collaboration with NIDCR, Epidemiology of HIVAssociated Cancers, emphasizes an interest in research on viruses associated with the development of lymphomas in persons who are HIV-infected.
Treatment of Lymphoma There have been major advances in the therapy of patients with lymphomas, especially the nonHodgkin's lymphomas.
NCI currently sponsors 75 clinical trials related to adult Hodgkin's disease (of 106 listed in the NCI's PDQ data base) and 25 clinical trials for childhood Hodgkin's disease (of 39 in PDQ).
NCI also sponsors 133 clinical trials related to adult non-Hodgkin's lymphoma (of 192 in PDQ) and 37 for childhood non-Hodgkin's lymphoma (of 59 in PDQ).
Another 29 NCI-sponsored clinical trials relate specifically to AIDS-related lymphomas (of 40 in PDQ).
These trials are aimed at improving treatments for lymphomas.
Additional funds are also devoted to patient accrual for studies within the cooperative group setting.
NCI- 55
Three types of treatment are most commonly used for lymphomas: radiation therapy (using high-dose x-rays or other high-energy rays to kill cancer cells and shrink tumors); chemotherapy (using drugs to kill cancer cells and shrink tumors); and immunotherapy (treating cancers with monoclonal antibodies or vaccines).
To treat certain types of non-Hodgkin's lymphoma that spread to the brain, chemotherapy may be put into the fluid that surrounds the brain through a needle in the brain or back (intrathecal chemotherapy).
There are treatments for lymphoma in children, and some of these small patients can be cured.
The most common treatments are radiation therapy and/or chemotherapy, but treatment may be different depending on the stage of the cancer and whether the child has reached full growth.
Unfortunately, some patients develop another form of cancer as a result of their treatment for Hodgkin's disease; for example female patients who received radiation therapy between the ages of 1016 years have an increased risk of breast cancer.
Regular follow-up evaluations are advisable.
The NCI is involved in the development of a large number of new chemotherapy agents with unique mechanisms of action.
Drugs which induce apoptosis, or programmed cell death, include compound 506U78, a purine analogue which has demonstrated impressive activity in a variety of lymphoid malignancies, even after failure from bone marrow transplantation, retinoids, and arsenicals.
Other agents inhibit the cell cycle including UCN-01, rapamycin, and flavopiridol, or inhibit expression of normal genes through histone deacetylation, such as depsipeptide.
Proteosome inhibitors and antiangiogenesis agents are also in clinical trials.
Perhaps the most important new treatment approaches involve the increasing number of biological therapies.
Biological treatment tries to help the body to fight cancer or infections.
It uses materials made by the body or made in a laboratory to boost, direct, or restore the body's natural defenses against disease.
The most widely studied biological therapies have been the monoclonal antibodies.
The NCI is collaborating with pharmaceutical sponsors in further development of rituximab by sponsoring several trials which will further elucidate the role of this antibody in the treatment of patients with various forms of non-Hodgkin's lymphoma and Hodgkin's disease.
For example, trials are underway in indolent and aggressive non-Hodgkin's lymphoma that are combining the antibody with chemotherapy as well as with other antibodies, attempting to attack multiple therapeutic targets on the same tumor cell.
In addition, NCI-sponsored studies are evaluating newer antibodies including Zevalin, Hu1D10, and epratuzumab.
Zevalin is an anti-CD20 radioimmunoconjugate which has the potential advantage of being able to carry radioactivity directly to the tumor site where it kills not only the antigen positive tumor cells, but also cells which may be antigen negative or those which in an area of the tumor which chemotherapy does not penetrate well.
These radioactive antibodies are being evaluated at low doses as well as higher doses to be used in the setting of bone marrow transplantation.
In order to optimize the use of these antibodies, it is important to have a better understanding of their mechanism of action and the mechanisms by which cells become resistant to these biological agents.
The NCI is sponsoring research directed at developing surrogate measures of early events in cell signaling induced in B-cell lymphomas that are sensitive or resistant to antibody-mediated effects and NCI- 56
evaluating how those signaling events correlate with clinical response to antibody therapy or the development of drug resistance.
More than 80 percent of patients with follicular non-Hodgkin's lymphoma over-express the bcl-2 gene.
The product of this gene inhibits apoptosis of the malignant lymphocytes which causes the tumors to grow and to be resistant to chemotherapy agents.
A new anti-sense compound is in clinical trials which has bcl-2 as its target.
Preliminary data suggest that it may be particularly effective when combined with chemotherapy.
Bone marrow transplantation and peripheral blood stem cell transplantation are also being tested in clinical trials for certain patients.
NCI spends nearly $70 million per year on transplantation research (relevant to numerous cancers in addition to lymphomas).
Sometimes Hodgkin's disease becomes resistant to treatment with radiation therapy or chemotherapy.
Very high doses of chemotherapy may then be used to treat the cancer.
Because the high doses of chemotherapy can destroy the bone marrow, marrow is taken from the bones before treatment.
The marrow is then frozen, and the patient is given high-dose chemotherapy with or without radiation therapy to treat the cancer.
The marrow is then thawed and given back to the patient through a needle in a vein to replace the marrow that was destroyed.
This type of transplant is called an autologous transplant.
If the marrow is taken from another person, the transplant is called an allogeneic transplant.
Another type of autologous transplant is called a peripheral blood stem cell transplant.
The patient's blood is passed through a machine that removes the stem cells (immature cells from which all blood cells develop), and then returns the blood to the patient.
This procedure is called leukapheresis and usually takes 3 or 4 hours to complete.
The stem cells are treated with drugs to kill any cancer cells and then frozen until they are transplanted to the patient.
This procedure may be done alone or with an autologous bone marrow transplant.
The role of stem cell transplantation in caring for patients with non-Hodgkin's lymphoma varies with the tumor histology.
Autologous stem cell transplantation clearly benefits patients in a chemotherapysensitive relapse of their disease, but its role as initial treatment is undefined.
A national trial is comparing the efficacy of initial transplantation with transplantation at the time of first relapse.
Other studies are evaluating the role of biological therapies such as interleukin-2 and rituximab for their effectiveness in enhancing the benefit of transplantation.
Allogeneic bone marrow transplant may cure patients who do not respond to standard chemotherapy.
However, the mortality of this procedure in patients with lymphomas has been very high.
There has now been an expanded information base on the use of non-myeloablative transplants with donor leukocyte infusions in non-Hodgkin's lymphoma.
Investigators from the Fred Hutchinson Cancer Center have described their experience with patients over the age of 55 years.
Graft-versus-host disease occurred less frequently than expected and many patients were able to go through the procedure without requiring hospitalization.
As a consequence, the notion that more intensive treatment is better is being challenged and the role of the immune system in cancer progression is being better delineated.
NCI- 57
Anti-cancer vaccines are a high priority of research for NCI.
Vaccine therapy for lymphomas has shown considerable promise.
In an attempt to export this technology as rapidly as possible, the NCI is sponsoring a multi-institutional trial in which patients will get standard treatment for their lymphoma followed by vaccine or no additional treatment.
Item Marine Mammals Research -- Sharks, skates, and rays seem to have an unusually low incidence of cancer and the potential for bioactive molecules to inhibit disease process in humans.
The Committee encourages NCI to study the immune systems and bioactive cell and tissue molecules of these marine animals to understand their resistance to cancer and the potential development of more effective therapies to inhibit cancer in humans.
(p. 59) Action taken or to be taken In 1992, I. William Lane authored a book entitled, ASharks Don=t Get Cancer,@and later a follow-up publication, ASharks Still Don=t Get Cancer,@ both of which promote shark cartilage to fight malignancies.
The alleged benefits of powdered shark cartilage have been widely publicized with claims that it could treat cancer, arthritis, and other diseases.
Many companies are now marketing shark cartilage pills, and oncologists are finding that a growing number of their patients have tried this alternative therapy.
However, at the April 2000 meeting of the American Association of Cancer Research (AACR) in San Francisco, two researchers presented findings proving that sharks do get cancer.
Based on a compilation of tumor cases in the NCI-sponsored Registry of Tumors in Lower Animals, located at the George Washington University (GWU), Washington, D.C., evidence was documented on over 40 benign and malignant tumors in sharks, skates, and rays.
These species all belong to the chondrichthyes family, whose members lack a bony skeleton.
Dr. John Harshbarger, GWU, and Dr. Gary Ostrander, The Johns Hopkins University, reported that these neoplasms, a third of which are cancers, occur in at least 20 species and originate from 16 cell types in all organ systems except respiratory.
Moreover, neoplasia has been found in more primitive cartilaginous fish (lamprey and hagfish) as well as in cartilaginous fish that are more advanced than sharks (lungfish, paddlefish, sturgeon, and bowfin).
Especially significant are three tumors of cartilaginous origin, two in dogfish sharks and one in a cat shark.
Research by Dr. Judah Folkman of Harvard University, dating from the 1970s, has found that collagen, a substance found in cartilage, can block the growth of new blood vessels that are essential for tumor growth.
In theory shark cartilage might stop cancer by blocking the growth of new blood vessels.
Because of the need to obtain conclusive evidence for or against the benefit of shark cartilage in cancer therapy and the continued strong public interest, the NCI is collaborating with NCCAM to sponsor clinical trials in this area.
A Phase III randomized study of induction chemotherapy and radiotherapy, with or without an oral shark cartilage extract, is now in the accrual stage for patients with stage IIIA or IIIB unresectable non-small cell lung cancer.
This double-blind, placebo- controlled, multicenter trial is being conducted through the NCI=s Community Clinical Oncology Program with oversight by NCI NCI- 58
Cancer Therapy Evaluation Program.
Accrual began in June 2000, with a total of 756 patients to be enrolled in this study.
The current study is significantly stronger than the one previously reported in 1998.
The latter study consisted of only 47 patients with advanced breast, colon, lung, or prostate cancer who were treated with shark cartilage pills.
In that small study, shark cartilage was found to be ineffective.
The rationale in this new trial is that shark cartilage extract may help shrink or slow the growth of non-small cell lung cancer cells.
It is not yet known if the combination of chemotherapy and radiation is more effective with or without shark cartilage.
An additional Phase III trial has just been approved.
This trial will enroll patients who have either breast cancer or colorectal cancer.
Since there is no previous evidence that shark cartilage is efficacious for a particular site, stratification by disease site will balance the arms of the study regarding potential discordance of survival across disease sites.
Because breast and colorectal cancers are common, accrual should be rapid.
One goal of the study, and a secondary endpoint, is to determine if shark cartilage treatments given in addition to standard therapy can improve the quality of life over and above that experienced through standard treatment plus placebo.
Accrual of 600 patients is planned.
In addition, NCI provides extensive information for physicians and the public interested in the potential use of shark cartilage for cancer treatment.
Information is made available through CancerNet and the Physician Data Query (PDQ) web-based systems.
Item Molecular Markers -- The development of molecular markers that are predictive of the presence or likelihood of regional metastasis in patients with head and neck cancer would provide useful prognostic information as well as identify patients at risk who could benefit from early elective treatment to the regional lymph nodes.
NCI is urged to expand research in this area.
(p. 59) Action taken or to be taken This Congressional query pertains to the early diagnosis of regional lymph node spread.
The single most significant indicator of worse prognosis is spread to the regional lymph nodes.
Patients with metastases to regional lymph nodes have about half the 5 year survival as patients without such metastases, for a given size of primary tumor.
When nodes are not felt in the examination, or discerned from the CT scan or MRI, they could still contain cancer in a minority of patients.
One of the goals of research on molecular characteristics of head and neck cancer, including the assessment of the likelihood of or the detection of occult lymph node metastasis, is the correlation of such molecular characteristics with behavior of the cancer is it likely to spread, to recur, or to be responsive to treatment? NCI is collaborating with the National Institute for Dental and Craniofacial Research (NIDCR) and the National Institute for Deafness and other Communication Disorders (NIDCD) on projects that address increasing the cure and prevention of head and neck cancer.
The objective of one pilot program is to determine the feasibility of exchanging scientific information between NCI and NIDCR program staff on grants of mutual interest in order to improve communication between the institutes on the progress and NCI - 59
opportunities in head and neck cancer research.
Since 1996, the NCI has supported multidisciplinary translational research in oral cancer by co-sponsoring, with NIDCR, three Oral Cancer Research Centers (U Alabama, UC San Francisco and U Chicago) with total costs of $5.5 million to the NCI over a period of 5 years.
In February 1999, NCI, NIDCR, and NIDCD held a Priorities Setting Workshop to address barriers, gaps, and opportunities for progress in head and neck cancer treatment and prevention.
As a direct response to the deliberations of this workshop, NCI and NIDCR have decided to support the establishment of "SPORES" (Specialized Programs of Research Excellence) in head and neck cancer, beginning in 2002, rather than to renew the oral cancer centers funding.
The major purpose of these multidisciplinary SPORES will be to increase translation of the cancer biology basic research into the clinic to improve patient outcomes.
Studies on functional preservation of voice and swallowing will also be encouraged.
Research in the SPORES will encompass biomarkers, databases, statistics expertise, as well as translational clinical trials for treatment and prevention of this disease.
A tissue repository with clinical and epidemiological data would be very helpful in identifying markers with promise.
Such a repository is in the planning stages, with collaboration between NCI and NIDCR.
The NCI has also published a comprehensive announcement of current NCI research funding opportunities in head and neck cancers.
This announcement can be found at http://www.cancer.gov/disease-initiatives/headneckcancer/main_toc.html.
To further support, translational research NCI issued a program announcement to support pilot studies of novel markers or innovative assays for the early detection, assessment of prognosis, or prediction of response to treatment of cancers.
Molecular approaches are already being piloted for detection, staging and treatment.
It is known that up to 90 percent of squamous cancers of the head and neck have abnormalities in the p16/Rb/cyclin D1 pathway, leading to abnormal signals for cells to proliferate.
Small studies have associated such abnormalities with a worse prognosis.
Patients with head and neck squamous cancers also may have increased expression of vascular endothelial growth factor (associated with angiogenesis, or new vessel formation), and these patients may have poorer survival.
Other markers, such as urokinase plasminogen activator, and epidermal growth factor receptor, have also been associated with decreased survival.
Comprehensive molecular analysis techniques, such as cDNA arrays, are also being applied to head and neck cancer.
Cooperative group Phase III trials often include the collection of tumor samples in order to study the association of molecular characteristics with prognosis or with response to therapy.
An example of this early work is the study of a marker of tumor proliferation (Ki-67) and abnormal expression of p53 in patients with locally advanced head and neck cancer treated with radiation therapy.
Although this study failed to define these two markers as prognostic for survival in this large cohort, they provided data that will be useful in planning and carrying out future marker studies.
Fortunately, several pharmacologic agents have now been shown to interact with some of the signaling NCI - 60
cascades thought to be important in the progression and metastases of head and neck cancer, such as EGFR and VEGF.
Such agents offer promise to study effects of inhibiting a particular pathway, as well as in combination with treatments that are currently employed, such as radiation and chemotherapy.
Several NCI-sponsored trials are currently ongoing with such agents.
Head and neck cancer patients often have tumors that can be sampled during therapy to see whether the new drug has affected its molecular target.
Recently, NCI has generated a drug development plan for such agents in treatment of advanced and/or recurrent head and neck cancer.
If they are promising, then use of targeted therapy could be studied in earlier stage disease.
Such early trials will also look at the effect of the drug on the target molecule in the cancer itself, thus leading to definition of a rational dose for such patients.
Intervening in cancer progression at early stages, before the appearance of invasive cancer, is a promising strategy for extending survival in patients with head and neck cancer, who frequently develop with premalignant lesions prior to their cancer diagnosis and who are at very high risk for a re-occurring cancer after their initial curative treatment.
The Division of Cancer Prevention is sponsoring multiple chemoprevention trials aimed at preventing progression of such precancerous lesions to overt invasive cancer in the oral cavity, larynx and pharynx.
Ongoing studies include several that are assessing the chemopreventive efficacy of various retinoids, a group of drugs that have been shown in prior clinical trials to revert precancerous lesions of the oral cavity and to prevent second primary cancers in patients.
Included in this list is a large, Phase III multi-institutional trial of 13-cis retinoic acid versus placebo in over 1300 curatively treated head and neck cancer patients, with the aim of determining if 13-cis retinoic acid reduces the rate of second tumor development in these patients.
This trial has completed its accrual.
Results from this trial are not yet available, although a recent analysis to reaffirm the safety of this approach revealed no adverse effects in the drug-treated group.
Other agents that are being studied in smaller trials are 9-cis retinoic acid, 4-hydroxyphenylretinamide (4-HPR), retinyl palmitate, curcumin, and Bowman-Birk inhibitor.
Combination therapies using biological approaches with alpha-interferon, 13-cis retinoic acid, and vitamin E are also being tested in patients with advanced premalignant lesions of the larynx.
Promising preventive agents that are being developed include non-steroidal antiinflammatory agents and lipoxygenase pathway inhibitors, two classes of drugs that appear to interfere with cancer cell growth, have minimal toxicity, and are currently in general clinical (non-cancer) use.
Built into the design of all prevention clinical trials are secondary end points assessing the potential of various markers to predict prognosis, drug efficacy, and to substitute for the endpoints of cancer incidence and survival (surrogates).
Identifying and validating such surrogate endpoint biomarkers could replace cancer incidence as the major endpoint and could significantly reduce the time and cost necessary to complete these clinical trials.
Examples of biomarkers that are being studied include markers of cell proliferation, oncogene expression, cell cycle regulatory proteins, indices of genetic damage, and differentiation markers.
Tissues are being saved from the clinical trials to allow future studies of novel markers as these become available.
Item Multiple Myeloma -- Multiple myeloma (MM) is an incurable cancer of the plasma cells of the bone NCI - 61
marrow.
MM is the second fastest growing hematological cancer in the U.S.
The Committee is pleased that MM was included in an NCI progress review group and looks forward to hearing about the Institute's plans for the groups findings at the fiscal year 2002 appropriations hearing.
(p. 59) Action taken or to be taken In August 2001, NCI established a Progress Review Group (PRG) to assist in setting long-term priorities for research on leukemia, lymphoma, and myeloma cancers.
Like other PRGs, this one is composed of between 20 and 30 prominent members of the scientific, medical, industry, and advocacy communities who are charged with outlining and prioritizing a national research agenda for a particular cancer site.
Using the NCI's current research program as a baseline, the PRG is identifying priority areas for research and will issue a final report listing research priorities and resource needs.
This report is scheduled for completion by the spring of 2001 and NCI will develop an implementation play by the end of FY 2001.
Multiple myeloma is a rare cancer of the bone marrow that involves the plasma cells, which play an important role in the body's immune response through the production of antibodies.
The disease is related to the lymphomas and at one time was included in the general category of lymphoma.
Multiple myeloma is the second fastest growing hematological cancer in the U.S. Common effects of the cancer include bone destruction caused by the plasma-cell tumors, life-threatening bacterial infections, and kidney damage.
While there has been progress in managing the effects of the disease, conventional chemotherapy has not been successful in treating the underlying cancer.
High-dose therapy with bone marrow transplant is used in the management of patients under age 70.
ThalidomideBthe medication that caused severe birth defects when given to pregnant women, is of value in treating these patients because the drug reduces the blood supply to the tumor.
Overall, treatment options are limited.
The median age at diagnosis of multiple myeloma is 62 years.
There is wide variation in occurrence among U.S. Populations, and the reasons for these differences are unknown.
Incidence rates in black men are seven times higher than those in Japanese-American men and more than double the rates of white men.
Among women there is a similar pattern of occurrence, with Chinese-American women at lowest risk, black women at highest risk, and white women approximately in the middle of the two.
The mortality patterns by race and ethnicity are similar to those for incidence, with blacks having approximately twice the rate of whites.
Mortality rates are approximately half those for incidence, underscoring the high mortality associated with multiple myeloma.
The average survival has increased only moderately since the 1970's, and is less than 4 years from time of diagnosis.
The etiology of multiple myeloma remains unknown.
Possible etiologic factors include ionizing radiation and occupational exposures.
Recent epidemiologic studies have failed to support past associations between benzene and multiple myeloma.
There is a consistently recognized increase in incidence among agricultural workers.
Hormonal influences may also be important, and studies are underway to explore possible genetic links, as well as past history of inflammatory diseases.
While some groups have reported the presence of the newly identified human herpes virus-8 (HHV-8) NCI - 62
in the genetic material of stromal bone marrow cells of patients with multiple myeloma, other European and U.S.-based studies have not always identified the virus.
HHV-8 is probably the causative agent of Kaposis's sarcoma, and has also been identified in two other B-cell disorders, primary effusion lymphoma and multicentric Castleman's disease.
That multiple myeloma is also associated with B-cell disorders made the link plausible when first reported.
Currently, there are questions whether the finding of HHV-8 in these patients suggest a link to development of multiple myeloma.
Instead, it is possible that the HHV-8 findings initially reported reflect the underlying incidence of HHV-8 in the populations.
Overt myeloma is often preceded by a disorder known as Monoclonal Gammopathy of Undetermined Significance.
A group from the Mayo Clinic is evaluating the prevalence of this entity and is following patients to determine the frequency with which MM develops and the immunological changes that may be associated with this transformation.
Therapeutic progress will be enhanced by a better understanding of the biology of a disease.
A result would be the availability of therapies which target a specific tumor type.
Other investigators from the Mayo Clinic are evaluating a number of genetic alterations in myeloma cells to see how they may influence programmed cell death, or apoptosis.
Interleukin-6, or IL-6, is a growth factor for MM cells.
The effect of this cytokine on a number of MM signaling pathways is being evaluated using both PCR and cDNA microarray analysis.
The goal would be new therapeutic strategies.
Despite initial responsiveness to cytotoxic chemotherapy, patients with MM eventually develop multidrug resistance.
Studies are ongoing at several institutions, including the University of Arizona, which are evaluating newly recognized mechanisms of drug resistance.
Using a DNA array analysis, these investigators will be evaluating the effect of genes involved in drug resistance and apoptosis and the effect of resistance modifiers on those genes in myeloma cells.
Other targets being explored include those involved in cell adhesion.
A group at the University of South Florida seeks to determine how cells survive the initial chemotherapy insult and then go on to develop drug resistance.
They are investigating the hypothesis that the myeloma microenvironment may disrupt cellular pathways and influence drug response by conferring cell-adhesion-mediated drug resistance.
BCNU is an agent with demonstrated activity in MM. Unfortunately, cells eventually become resistant due to the activity of a number of DNA repair mechanisms.
O6-benzylguanine is a relatively non-toxic drug which has the ability to sensitize cells to cytotoxicity of BCNU in vitro by inhibiting these mechanisms.
Phase I and II trials are now underway to determine if the efficacy of BCNU can be increased at standard doses and in the transplant setting.
NCI-sponsored research is also focusing on developing new and more effective chemotherapy agents.
One such class of drugs are the farnesyl transferase inhibitors.
These drugs prevent the activation of the RAS oncogene, which may be responsible, in part, for the tumor growth.
Clinical response rates are being correlated with drug levels and inhibition of farnesyl transferase and mutation status of the RAS gene.
Another class of drugs which, while old, are only recently being rediscovered, are the arsenicals.
Arsenic trioxide is extremely active in acute promyelocytic leukemia.
Other studies have shown that it induces programmed cell death in a variety of lymphoid malignancies.
Thus, it is now being tested in patients with MM as well.
NCI - 63
High dose chemotherapy with autologous stem cell transplantation has emerged as a standard treatment option for select patients with MM based on the reports of a single French study.
An U.S. trial is coming to completion within the next few months that will either confirm or refute these findings.
Nevertheless, few, if any, patients are cured with this procedure.
As a result, a number of modifications are being evaluated, including the addition of drugs such as thalidomide.
Other studies are attempting to modify the patient's own leukocytes to recognize the tumor cells as foreign and to mount an immune response against those cells.
Additional studies are determining the feasibility of inducing an active immune response against myeloma-specific antigens, such as MUC-1 and DF3.
Preclinical studies of idiotype immunization demonstrate that this approach can induce an immune response which prevents tumor relapse or progression in myeloma models.
Investigators at the Fred Hutchinson Cancer Research Center (FHCRC) are evaluating whether a series of immunizations can induce idiotype specific T cell responses following autologous and allogeneic stem cell transplantation.
Once the optimal method of delivering the immunizations is determined, they will evaluate the ability of immunization to induce immune responses in patients with MM following stem cell transplantation.
Allogeneic bone marrow transplantation remains the only potentially curative therapy for MM.
The toxicities associated with this procedure in patients with MM have been almost prohibitive, with a 30 percent-50 percent treatment-related death rate.
Moreover, age restrictions limit the number of patients who might be eligible for this procedure.
There has now been an expanded information base on the use of submyeloabltive transplants with donor leukocyte infusions in MM. Investigators from the FHCRC have described their experience with patients over the age of 55 years.
Graft versus host disease was less than expected and many patients were able to go through the procedure without requiring hospitalization.
As a consequence, the notion that more intensive treatment is better is being challenged and the role of the immune system in cancer progression is being better delineated.
Many patients fail stem cell transplantation and major efforts are directed at identifying the reasons and to develop methods to improve on these results.
Investigators at the Dana Farber Cancer Center are developing anti-myeloma specific T cells to treat minimal residual disease following transplantation.
Also, they are developing methods to induce a patient immune response against HHV-8, a recently discovered tumor specific virus.
Another approach to the management of use of donor leukocyte infusions (DLI). effect, however they are also capable of fatal to the patient.
Studies of the T-cell necessary T-cell population.
patients who have failed a bone marrow transplantation is the DLI include cells which are capable of graft-versus-myeloma generating a potent graft-versus-host-disease which may be repertoire post DLI are being conducted to better define the
Investigators at the University of Arkansas are attempting to improve on the efficacy and safety of DLIs.
They are evaluating the clinical effects of infusion lymphocytes transduced with a suicide gene that will permit the lymphocytes to have the beneficial graft-versus-myeloma effect but without the GVHD.
NCI - 64
The NCI also funds the International Bone Marrow Transplant Registry which is the world's largest body of data on outcomes following transplantation for myeloma and other tumors.
Data is provided from more than 400 centers and there are now data for more than 65,000 transplants world-wide.
These data are used for determining transplant regimens for specific clinical situations, identifying prognostic factors, comparing transplant regimens, comparing transplant with non-transplant approaches, evaluating cost and cost-effectiveness, planning clinical trials, and developing approaches to evaluate patient outcome.
Several laboratories have demonstrated increased density of blood vessels in the bone marrow from patients with MM, suggesting abnormal angiogenesis.
As a result there is great interest in evaluating new antiangiogenesis agents in this disease.
A number of protocols are determining the activity of these agents along with chemotherapy or stem cell transplantation.
Mayo clinic investigators are assessing changes in bone marrow angiogenesis, expression of a number of angiogenic factors and their receptors before, during, and after thalidomide therapy to determine how best to use antiangiogenesis therapy.
The NCI remains committed to improving the outcome of patients with MM through funding basic and clinical research projects.
The Cancer Therapy Evaluation Program funds 28 grants which involve MM with a total budget of more than $20 million.
Item Multiple Myeloma -- The Committee continues to urge NCI to support epidemiological and other data gathering activities relevant to MM and to coordinate efforts with CDC, NIEHS, the Office of Rare Diseases, and the Office of Research on Minority Health.
The Committee encourages the Institute to disseminate and educate the public and health professionals about the symptoms of and treatment for MM. (p. 59) Action taken or to be taken Please refer to pages NCI-62 through NCI-65 of this document for NCI's response to this significant item regarding Multiple Myeloma.
Item National Occupational Research Agenda -- The Committee encourages NCI to work with the National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health to enhance research in relevant National Occupational Research Agenda priority areas such as Cancer Research Methods, Special Populations at Risk, Mixed Exposures, Risk Assessment Methods, and Exposure Assessment Methods. (p. 59) Action taken or to be taken For almost 25 years, NCI has collaborated with the National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health (NIOSH) on research projects related to occupational health issues.
In FY 2001, NCI
NCI - 65
collaborated with NIOSH on several research activities that support the initiatives of the National Occupational Research Agenda (NORA); and NCI investigators serve on the NORA Team for Occupational Cancer Research Methods.
Some specific research activities are listed below: In a study of cosmic ionizing radiation exposure among airline flight attendants, NCI and NIOSH are evaluating the use of various cytogenetic markers to improve exposure assessment.
These biomarkers of exposure will be useful for research on breast cancer in this population.
The project includes a methodologic component to develop procedures to estimate these exposures.
Researchers are conducting a retrospective mortality study and a nested case-control study of lung cancer in a cohort of non-metal miners to estimate the risk in relation to exposure to diesel exhaust.
Excess mortality from other causes also will be evaluated.
This study will advance the NORA priority areas of Exposure Assessment Methods and Risk Assessment Methods.
An extensive effort to characterize current and historical exposures to the exhaust, and to develop estimates of personal exposures is an intrinsic part of the study.
Another component of the study will relate biomarkers of exposure and effect to level of diesel exhaust exposure.
We will examine whether exposed workers have detectable levels of nitro-PAH metabolites in their urine and nitro-PAH DNA adducts in a spectrum of tissues.
This research will provide insight into the early biologic effects of diesel exhaust exposure and help clarify the biologic relevance of various components of diesel exhaust.
Methodologic procedures are being developed to fully utilize the availability of radiation badges among a cohort of x-ray technologists to assess cumulative level of exposure to radiation.
The resulting exposure assessment method will be extremely useful in conducting cancer research in this population which, in turn, could have relevance to workers in occupations with similar cumulative levels of radiation exposure and to the general population.
Related to the NORA area, Surveillance Research Methods, NCI and NIOSH are continuing to coordinate efforts to code industry and occupational titles from death certificates from 25 U.S. States; creating a surveillance system that can be used to evaluate occupation and all causes of mortality, including cancer.
The database has been used in numerous epidemiologic investigations.
NCI is working with NIOSH to improve the assessment of occupational and indirect bystander exposure to pesticides and other agricultural exposures in the Agricultural Health Study, a large prospective cohort study of approximately 90,000 people.
The study includes licensed private pesticide applicators (mostly farmers), their spouses, and commercial applicators.
The exposure assessment methods will have relevance for studies of pesticide exposure among occupational groups and among members of the general population.
In an ongoing collaborative study with NIOSH, NCI is evaluating the influence of genetic factors on bladder cancer risk among Chinese workers exposed to benzidine, an established bladder carcinogen.
In addition, NCI is currently supporting several other grants that responded to the NCI/NIOSH initiatives.
These grants support advancement in methods of assessing environmental and/or NCI - 66
occupational exposures and the associated risks of developing cancer.
They do so by developing and improving retrospective and surveillance methods to determine specific exposures to chemical and physical agents in various occupational and environmental settings.
NCI is also collaborating with NIOSH on an initiative called, "Endocrine Disrupters: Epidemiologic Approaches."
This initiative solicits investigator-initiated studies on the role of endocrine disrupter chemicals (EDCs) in cancer development.
EDCs are synthetic chemicals, used or manufactured in the workplace and released in the environment, that may cause adverse health effects by interfering with the function of the endocrine system.
While it has been speculated that some endocrine-related diseases or conditions, such as breast and prostate cancers, are caused by EDC exposure, no linkage has been established between exposure to a specific environmental EDC and an adverse health effect in humans.
NCI is expecting to support three to five new projects in FY 2002.
Item Neurofibromatosis -- The Committee encourages NCI to strengthen its NF research portfolio in such areas as further development of animal models, natural history studies, and therapeutic experimentation and clinical trials.
The Committee also urges NCI to continue to coordinate its efforts with other Institutes engaged in NF research.
(p. 59) Action taken or to be taken The neurofibromatoses (NF) are genetic disorders that cause tumors to grow on nerves and produce other abnormalities such as skin changes and bone deformities.
Because NF may affect cognitive functions as well as hearing and sight, these disorders fall within the purview of a number of institutes within NIH, and attempts are being made to coordinate the research effort across NIH.
For example, as part of a coordinated NIH effort to expand NF research, NCI participated in a 2-day workshop hosted by NINDS to assess the status of NF research and to identify future research opportunities.
Besides NCI and NINDS, the meeting included a panel of 17 extramural basic scientists and clinicians, representatives from 4 NIH institutes (NICHD, NEI, NHLBI, and NIDCD), two other federal agencies with NF research programs (DoD and the Veterans Administration), the pharmaceutical industry, and two national NF patient advocacy groups.
The meeting explored recent basic science or therapeutics research, and discussed proposals regarding research priorities and strategies in NF. Several priorities were agreed upon, including development of more refined animal models for NF1 and NF2; further analysis of the mechanisms of action of neurofibromin and merlin - the proteins whose functions are disrupted in NF1 and NF2 respectively; and the identification of modifier genes that affect the expression of neurofibromin and merlin.
The results of this workshop were subsequently discussed with the broader NF research community at the annual meeting of the International Consortium for the Molecular and Cell Biology of NF1 and NF2.
NIH institutes, including NCI, are working on developing several new NF- related initiatives to respond to the research needs and priorities identified through these meetings, and to stimulate interest in NF research from non-NF researchers.
These initiatives will likely be focused on gene discovery research directly applicable to finding modifier genes for NF, and development of a registry for neurological disorders which would include a DNA collection NCI - 67
and facilitate natural history and genetic studies in NF.
These initiatives will employ a variety of mechanisms - RFA, RFP, and investigator-initiated projects, as well as an additional workshop to facilitate NF clinical research.
NF is found in every racial and ethnic group throughout the world and affects both sexes equally.
The disorders have been subdivided into neurofibromatosis type 1 (NF1) and neurofibromatosis type 2 (NF2).
Other or variant types of NF may exist, but are not yet fully characterized.
At least 85 percent are represented by Type I (von Recklinghausen or classic peripheral neurofibromatosis, with a prevalence of about 1:4,000 live births) and an additional ten percent by Type II (acoustic or central neurofibromatosis, with a prevalence of about 1:40,000 live births).
Both NF1 and NF2 are autosomal dominant disorders with nearly full penetrance and both have a high rate of sporadic occurrence--about 30-50 percent.
In both major forms of NF, severity of symptoms can vary greatly.
Effects can be severely disabling, mildly disfiguring or can even go undetected.
A number of NIH institutes, including NCI, support scientists who are striving to understand the genetic and molecular basis of NF.
We now know that the NF1 gene is on chromosome 17, while the gene for NF2 is on chromosome 22.
Scientists are using this information to develop precise tests aimed at definitively diagnosing these disorders, even before an individual develops symptoms.
Some of the lifethreatening complications of NF are amenable to treatment.
Therefore, alertness to the common clinical manifestations, as well as a thorough evaluation of potentially affected individuals and their families, close follow-up, and thoughtful genetic counseling are well warranted in this disease.
Recently a more targeted approach for the treatment of progressive plexiform neurofibromas has become available and is being studied.
The underlying cause of NF1 is a defective gene.
The function of this gene is to produce a protein called neurofibromin.
In patients with NF1, neurofibromin is decreased, and the decrease in neurofibromin is felt to contribute directly to tumor formation.
Neurofibromin helps control the activity of another protein called ras. Ras can be thought of as an "on/off" switch for cell growth.
When ras is "on", cells divide.
When ras is "off", the cells do not divide.
Neurofibromin helps to keep ras turned "off".
Decreased levels of neurofibromin therefore may allow for uncontrolled cell division and tumor formation.
Drugs that inactivate ras are being studied as a new way to treat cancer.
These drugs may also provide a logical means of controlling the tumors in patients with NF1.
One class of drugs that inhibits ras signaling is the farnesyl-protein transferase (FPTase) inhibitors, and NCI is supporting Phase I and Phase II trials of drugs in this class for the treatment of solid tumors and leukemias in both adults and children.
NCI will soon begin accrual to a clinical trial studying the FPTase inhibitor R115777 for patients with NF1.
NCI will also participate in an ongoing multi-institutional study, called Protocol of the Natural History of Plexiform Neurofibromas in NF1, to assess the natural history of patients with NF1 and plexiform neurofibromas.
The primary goals of the Natural History Protocol are to study the natural history of plexiform neurofibromas and to evaluate the usefulness of volumetric tumor measurements in this disease.
Other goals of the Natural History Protocol are to establish a tissue bank, in which tissue NCI - 68
samples obtained on the protocol will be made available to investigators after appropriate IRB review.
Clinical information about patients will be entered in a central database.
Participation in this trial will allow NCI intramural scientists to expand their experience with NF1.
In addition, patients in this study who develop disease progression will likely be eligible for participation in the Phase II trial of R115777.
NCI also supports clinical trials through the pediatric clinical trials cooperative groups that specifically include children with cancers associated with NF1.
Of special concern are the brain tumors associated with NF1 and in particular the low-grade gliomas that develop in children with NF1.
The NCIsupported Children's Oncology Group is conducting a clinical trial for children younger than 10 years of age with progressive low grade astrocytoma.
The primary objective of the study is to compare eventfree-survival (EFS) in children who are treated either with a regimen of carboplatin and vincristine (CV) or with a regimen of 6-thioguanine (6TG), procarbazine, CCNU, and vincristine (TPCV).
Accrual is limited to children with disease that is progressive after surgery or whose risk of neurologic impairment with progression is high enough to require immediate treatment.
Children with neurofibromatosis who have radiographic diagnosis of chiasmatic-hypothalamic tumor are eligible for the study after tumor progression is documented radiographically.
Significant progress has been made in the development of animal models for NF. By generating mice whose hematopoietic system is reconstituted with neurofibromatosis type 1-deficient hematopoietic stem cells, NCI intramural scientists showed that NF1 gene loss produces a myeloproliferative disease similar to human juvenile chronic myelogenous leukemia, which is observed at increased frequency in juvenile human NF1 patients.
They also identified homeobox genes (Hoxa7, Hoxa9, and a Pbx1 -related gene, Meis1) that appear to cooperate with NF1 gene loss in the progression to acute murine myeloid disease.
They showed that Meis1 is part of a multigene family with at least two other family members, defining a new family of Pbx-related homeobox genes and two new potential disease genes.
Mice heterozygous in the NF1 gene are predisposed to a number of tumor types, however unlike humans, these mice do not develop peripheral nerve sheath tumors.
Recently, researchers have discovered that chimeric mice composed in part of NF1 null cells do develop these tumors characteristic of the human disease.
It was further discovered that mice carrying germ line mutations in NF1 and p53 develop malignant peripheral nerve sheath tumors supporting a causal and cooperative role for p53 mutations in development of such tumors.
An independent research group has found that 100 percent of mice harboring null NF1 and p53 alleles in cis synergize to develop soft tissue sarcomas between 3 and 7 months of age.
These sarcomas exhibit loss of heterozygosity at both gene loci and express phenotypic traits characteristic of neural crest derivatives and human NF1 malignancies.
These new mouse models provide the means to address fundamental aspects of disease development and to test therapeutic strategies.
Item Ovarian Cancer -- The Committee commends NCI for moving forward to fully fund two ovarian cancer SPOREs and partially fund two other ovarian cancer SPOREs in fiscal year 2000.
The Committee encourages NCI to fully fund all SPOREs this fiscal year and requests that the Director of the Institute be prepared to give a progress report at the fiscal year 2002 appropriations hearing.
(p. NCI - 69
59) Action taken or to be taken NCI is committed to improving the prevention, detection, and treatment of ovarian cancers.
All four ovarian cancer Special Programs of Research Excellence (SPOREs) will be fully funded in FY 2001, and NCI expects these new ovarian cancer SPOREs ­ which support innovative, multidisciplinary research with the potential to have an immediate impact on cancer care and prevention ­ will be important hubs of progress against this disease.
The SPORE program will be substantially expanded between FY 2001 to FY 2003 to add seven new cancer sites including a gynecological cancer solicitation in FY 2003.
In addition, another ovarian SPORE solicitation will be issued in FY 2003.
Also, in early FY 2001, NCI established a Progress Review Group (PRG) to assist in setting long-term priorities for research on gynocological cancers, including ovarian cancer.
Like other PRGs, this one is composed of between 20 and 30 prominent members of the scientific, medical, industry, and advocacy communities who are charged with outlining and prioritizing a national research agenda for a particular cancer site.
Using the NCI's current research program as a baseline, the PRG will identify priority areas for research and will issue a final report listing research priorities and resource needs.
This report is scheduled for completion by the end of FY 2001 and NCI will develop an implementation plan by mid FY 2002.
Item Prostate Cancer --. . . .
The Committee urges NCI to place an increased priority on research, through all available mechanisms, as appropriate, including clinical trials, that result in earlier, more reliable detection methods and more effective and less disfiguring treatment regimes. (p. 60) Action taken or to be taken The frequency and importance of prostate cancer as a serious health problem is well known and has been summarized by NCI in many places, so will not be repeated here..
The prostate cancer research agenda of the NCI is extensive and diverse.
It includes studies to better understand the etiology (causation) and genetics of the disease, epidemiologic studies to correlate environmental, dietary, and genetic influences with risk, studies to determine the utility and optimal application of screening, studies to improve current treatments and develop new ones, and studies to assess patterns of care in the U.S. NCI's prostate cancer research is guided by the results of the Prostate Cancer Progress Review Group (PRG) - a process in which experts and advocates in the field reviewed the NCI research portfolio and developed a comprehensive series of recommendations.
The results of the PRG then served as the basis for developing a 5-Year Plan in late 1998 (Planning for Prostate Cancer Research: Five-Year Professional Judgment Estimates).
In support of the PRG's recommendations and the 5-Year Plan, NCI substantially increased funding for prostate cancer research, from $86.9 million in FY 1998 to over $200 million in FY 2000.
The report of the 5-Year Plan describes prostate cancer research NCI - 70
opportunities across NIH from 1999 through 2003.
The scientific opportunities identified fell into four major areas: · · · · Clinical Science - the near term direct testing of new interventions in patients or in those at risk for prostate cancer.
Translational Science - moving ideas from the laboratory to the point of clinical testing, and determining how they should be applied and tested.
Risk, Burdens 
Basic research and discovery - longer term investments in gaining insight into the development and biology of prostate cancer and the development of models for study.
Ongoing and future research initiatives have the potential to directly improve the length and quality of life of prostate cancer patients and survivors, as well as those at risk for the disease.
Indeed, fully 70 percent of the research opportunities in the 5-Year Plan and discussed in this report are targeted at clinical or translational research that would have a direct impact on patients, survivors, and at-risk men.
Understanding the Biology and Etiology of Prostate Cancer Current research suggests the presence of several prostate cancer susceptibility genes and of several potential environmental or dietary influences.
However, searches for these are made difficult by the diversity and by the late onset of this disease, which greatly increase the complexity of dietary and lifestyle analyses and often precludes the examination of large families in which all members are currently alive.
The NCI SEER Program tracks prostate cancer incidence and diagnostic patterns in detail in 10 areas of the U.S.
In collaboration with the National Center for Health Statistics, SEER tracks and publishes cancer mortality data for the entire country.
The recently published Atlas of Cancer Mortality in the United States, 1950-94, characterized a distinct pattern of prostate cancer excesses among Caucasians in the Northwest, Rocky Mountain, and north-central areas of the U.S., and among African-Americans in the southeastern part of the U.S.
After steady increases in the past several decades in prostate cancer mortality, a recent downturn was noted.
These patterns are providing leads for further studies and for research in prostate cancer prevention.
The NIH-AARP Diet and Health Study is a prospective study of prostate cancer, with a focus on nutritional factors.
The cohort is very large (over 540,000 men and women, over 320,000 men) and is characterized by a wide dietary intake range for several important dietary factors (fat, fiber, fruits and vegetables, red meat).
Over 10,000 prostate cancers are anticipated during the first 5 years of followup; endpoints will be available in 2003.
Pending the results of a pilot study, we expect to obtain buccal cell DNA from over 160,000 men, which will permit the examination of a number of gene-environment interactions in prostate carcinogenesis.
The International Consortium for Prostate Cancer Genetics (ICPCG) was formed in October 1996 to NCI - 71
address and overcome, through collaborative research the problems associated with prostate cancer susceptibility gene mapping and identification.
This consortium consists of over 20 institutions in seven different countries in North America, Europe and Australia, all with ongoing research programs in this area.
The size and diversity of this group, including families from diverse ethnic and racial groups, makes it ideally suited to address questions pertinent to the molecular genetics and genetic epidemiology of prostate cancer, including the understanding of different genetic etiologies (genetic heterogeneity), gene-gene interactions, and other cancers with increased occurrence in prostate-cancer families.
A primary goal of the ICPCG is to rapidly and efficiently test promising hypotheses that have been generated by individual research groups.
Members of the ICPCG have already carried out a collaborative analysis of data linkage for identified markers for new susceptibility genes in 772 families, and have conducted a genome-wide scan in most of the participating families to identify new susceptibility loci.
Cancer Genetics Network (CGN): Established in 1998, the CGN is a national Network of centers specializing in the study of inherited predisposition to cancer.
Consisting of 8 centers and an Informatics and Information Technology Group, CGN supports collaborative studies on the genetic basis of cancer susceptibility, mechanisms to integrate this new knowledge into medical practice, and means of addressing the associated psychosocial, ethical, legal, and health issues.
Gene discovery research is being developed in consultation with other prostate cancer gene discovery activities, such as the ICPCG and the Specialized Programs of Research Excellence (SPORE) for prostate cancer.
(The prostate cancer SPORE was developed to promote interdisciplinary research and to speed the bidirectional exchange between basic and clinical science in order to move basic research findings from the laboratory to applied settings involving prostate cancer patients and populations.)
The Cancer Genome Anatomy Project (CGAP) is a project to build an index of all genes that are expressed in tumors and support development of new technologies that will allow high throughput analysis of gene and protein expression as well as mutation detection.
The tumor type with the highest representation in the early stages of the CGAP effort is prostate cancer.
NCI has facilitated investigator collaborations of interdisciplinary studies following the recent discovery of a susceptibility gene for prostate cancer.
Leads from this effort may also help to clarify genetic and gene-environment interactions responsible for African-American-Caucasian differences in risk.
Other epidemiologic studies underway include: a large cohort study of agricultural workers in the U.S. upper Midwest and the Southeast to examine suspicions that farming practices are related to the elevated prostate cancer risks in this population; a collaborative case-control study with the University of South Carolina to address risk factors for prostate cancer in high-risk areas of the U.S. identified by the new NCI cancer maps; a collaboration with Norwegian and CDC investigators regarding environmental exposures to DDT and PCB congeners; a U.S. population-based case-control study investigating the increased risk of prostate cancer among men with a history of gonorrhea or syphilis; a systematic pathology review of approximately 1,000 cases of incident prostate cancer in Israeli Ashkenazi men diagnosed from 1994-1995 to determine the age-specific carrier rate of BRCA1 and NCI - 72
BRCA2 mutations in this population and to determine if there are distinguishing features of BRCAassociated prostate cancer; a study of the effects of in utero exposure to diethylstilbesterol (DES) on prostate cancer risk are being evaluated in the sons of DES-exposed women; a study of the associations of high levels of insulin-like growth factor (IGF-1) and low levels of it's major serum binding protein (IGFBP-3) with prostate cancer risk in Washington Co., MD and in Hawaii; and a study of the types of fat associated with prostate cancer risk among African-Americans, Caucasians, and Asians.
NCI is organizing a major meeting, "Emerging Opportunities in Prostate Cancer Epidemiology", which will address gene discovery and gene-environment interactions research directions and strategic approaches, with a special emphasis on multiethnic variation, i.e., health disparities.
After completion of enrollment to the first national prostate cancer prevention trial (PCPT-1), a larger study of 32,000 men is being launched this year.
The SELECT trial (Selenium and Vitamin E Cancer Prevention Trial) will serve as a major test of dietary supplementation to reduce the risk of prostate cancer development in moderate-to-high risk individuals.
Screening Public awareness of prostate cancer and participation in both early detection and screening programs have increased markedly in the U.S. over the last decade.
Encouragingly, a national decrease in mortality from prostate cancer has been observed since 1992.
Although it is easily assumed that this represents a benefit of screening programs, careful analysis of the geographic and annual data by extramural and NCI epidemiologists suggests that that explanation, at most, accounts for only a small proportion of the mortality trend.
A substantial proportion of the mortality improvement may be related to a vastly increased and much earlier utilization of therapies such as radiation and hormones for patients with only biochemical (PSA) evidence of recurrent disease.
There may also be substantial effects from life style or dietary trends of the past 2-3 decades, or other factors.
Research into these issues is a major project of NCI.
It is very difficult to dissect the various influences on mortality in population studies.
For this purpose, a randomized intervention trial is the most direct and definitive approach.
NCI's PLCO, launched in 1993, is a large U.S. multi-center randomized controlled trial assessing the efficacy of prostate cancer screening versus a non-screening strategy.
If the mortality effects are as large as some suppose, and if they are apparent within only a few years from initiating screening programs, then the PLCO trial should be able to detect a benefit within only a few more years.
In addition, within the PLCO trial, NCI Intramural investigators are examining genetic and environmental risk factors that may shed light on issues of susceptibility and causation.
The National Health Interview Survey (NHIS) is a large, annual population-based health survey sponsored by CDC and NCI.
The 2000 NHIS will provide information on prostate cancer screening habits by collecting information from approximately 40,000 households with an over-sample of AfricanAmerican and Hispanic populations.
NCI also initiated an international collaboration among NCI - 73
researchers in Europe and North America conducting prostate cancer screening randomized trials known as the International Prostate Screening Trial Evaluation Group (IPSTEG).
The purpose of this collaboration is to develop and implement an evaluation plan for the joint analysis of randomized trial data on prostate cancer screening using prostate specific antigen (PSA).
A combined analysis offers increased statistical power and a larger, more informative database over an individual study.
The total sample is anticipated to be in excess of 300,000 men, with a follow-up period of at least 10 years.
On the public education side of screening, several of the NCI's Special Populations Networks are working with the NCI Cancer Information Service and are involved in disseminating information on prostate cancer issues including the potential benefits and risks of screening.
Also, information specialists from the Cancer Information Service provide more than 60,000 people annually with information about prostate cancer, research on the disease, screening and treatment options, and information about coping with physical and psychological side effects of the disease and its treatment.
The NCI web site provides information about clinical trials as well as information about treatment options for every stage of prostate cancer.
NCI is currently working with the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and with the Health Care Financing Administration (HCFA) to develop an educational video for men on issues they could face with regard to prostate cancer screening, diagnosis, and treatment.
The video, intended to be relevant to a general male audience, will be developed to have special relevance to African-American men.
It will provide educational material on what men need to know about prostate cancer screening options, what they need to know about diagnostic follow-up if a screening test is positive, and treatment options.
Segregating Aggressive from Indolent Prostate Cancers Satisfactory answers to many current dilemmas in management of prostate cancer patients - for example, the role of routine screening, or initial management by prostatectomy versus radiation versus watchful waiting - may only be found when we know enough about individual tumors to predict their individual behavior and assess their vulnerabilities.
The tools we currently have for determining which prostate cancers are most likely to recur are crude and imperfect.
We can estimate this very approximately by using the tumor appearance under a microscope, the stage, and the PSA level; but there is so much overlap that the decision making for many patients is still terribly difficult.
If we had better ways to classify whether an individual patient's tumor is one with a high malignant potential or one of the larger number that poses considerably less risk, then we could much more easily test early detection and screening technologies, and provide the confidence that could spare many men the long term side effects of prostate surgery or radiation.
A goal for the next several years is to develop what has been called "molecular profiling" or "molecular signatures" ­ the identification of patterns of gene and protein expression abnormalities that will someday enhance a clinician's ability to predict the behavior of a particular cancer.
Two of NCI's largest projects, both of them identified as Extraordinary Opportunities in the NCI's Bypass Budgets, provide the infrastructure for grappling with this need.
The CGAP has thus far discovered more than 150 genes that appear to be prostate-specific, and over 400 genes that appear to be expressed
NCI - 74
differently between normal prostate tissue and prostate cancer.
This information, and subsequent discoveries of CGAP, will provide the raw material for the next initiative, the NCI Director's Challenge for Molecular Diagnostics.
The goal of the Director's Challenge is to develop a tumor classification system that is firmly based on the cell biology of cancers, rather than on microscopic appearance.
Prostate cancer is a particularly important area of application for this initiative, because its behavior is so variable from patient to patient.
This variability underlies many of the unresolved or controversial clinical issues and confounds our ability to make definitive recommendations that apply broadly to most patients.
Thus, it would be difficult to overestimate the potential benefit to patients with prostate cancer of progress in this direction of molecular signatures and molecular classifications.
Clinical Trials NCI sponsors a very large number of prostate cancer clinical trials by grants to individual investigators in hospitals and academic institutions, grants to cancer centers and large multi-center research consortia, by collaboration with pharmaceutical and biotechnology firms, and within its intramural programs.
These trials range from small-scale early testing of novel agents, or new combinations, to very largescale and definitive randomized trials that can establish the value of a new intervention, and include studies of all types, including treatment, prevention, screening and early detection, supportive care, symptom management, and others.
The recent requirement that HCFA cover the patient care costs for Medicare beneficiaries enrolled in clinical trials sets a national precedent and is a win-win for both researchers and patients.
It expands patients' opportunities to enroll in leading-edge clinical research, promotes the development of clinical trials that address questions specific to the elderly, and allows important clinical research questions in prostate cancer to be addressed.
Last year, NCI funded (in total or in part) 246 clinical trials in prostate cancer, including 80 Phase III studies and 37 Phase II treatment studies.
Many of the larger studies were intended to test and optimize new hormonal and chemotherapeutic approaches for the most common clinical presentations of the disease, including: $ $ $ $ adjuvant therapy or neo-adjuvant therapy (intended to prevent recurrence) when added to primary surgical or radiation treatment treatment in the setting of rising PSA levels after definitive local therapy treatment after hormone therapy is no longer effective advanced disease, particularly directed at bony metastases
As part of ongoing initiatives to expand access to clinical trials for larger numbers of cancer patients and to make the state-of-the-art treatment they provide a viable therapeutic option for patients in most clinical settings, NCI has broadened eligibility criteria for many of its clinical trials.
Clinical trials have also been developed for stages of disease that were not often studied previously.
Clinical trials for prostate cancer patients with rising PSA as the only indicator of disease recurrence are an example of
NCI - 75
this approach.
In order to provide earlier access to novel agents, NCI has developed ways to enroll patients with more advanced disease on clinical trials, whether or not they have already received conventional hormonal therapy.
These approaches offer greater participation in therapeutic decisionmaking and autonomy for well informed patients who desire more novel experimental approaches despite potentially greater risks.
NCI's extensive early therapeutics development program for novel chemotherapy and immunologic agents sponsors many small exploratory trials in prostate cancer and other tumor types.
Among the promising new approaches currently under study are inhibitors of angiogenesis and metastasis, the processes by which cancers induce new blood-vessel formation, invade these blood vessels, and spread throughout the body; growth factors and their receptors, which mediate growth signals to cancer cells; tissue-specific genes expressed selectively in prostate or prostate cancer cells, thus allowing for the targeting of tumor-killing modalities to these cells; monoclonal antibodies; vaccines; hormones; and agents targeting bone as the major site of spread for prostate cancers, as well as combinations of these agents with others or with radiation therapy.
These agents and approaches could not all be catalogued here in any degree of detail and in any case the results are not mature.
Some other important developments of very general interest include: · NCI's Prostate Cancer Prevention Trial (PCPT-1) is the first major trial of chemoprevention in prostate cancer.
18,000 healthy men over the age of 55 were enrolled to determine if the drug finasteride could prevent development of prostate cancer.
A second, larger study of 32,000 men will be launched this year.
The SELECT trial (Selenium and Vitamin E Cancer Prevention Trial) will serve as a major test of dietary supplementation to reduce the risk of prostate cancer development in moderate-to-high risk individuals.
Using data collected within the Prostate Cancer Outcomes Study (PCOS), investigators have found that patients with clinically localized cancer who undergo radical prostatectomy have less aggressive cancers compared with men who receive external beam radiotherapy.
Almost 2 years after treatment, men receiving radical prostatectomy were more likely than those receiving radiotherapy to be incontinent (10 percent versus 4 percent) and to have higher rates of impotence (80 percent vs. 62 percent), although large, statistically significant declines in sexual function were observed in both treatment groups.
Men undergoing radiotherapy reported greater declines in bowel function.
These estimates of long-term treatment complications are much higher than estimates from previous studies conducted in major academic medical centers.
Other PCOS-based studies have reported on health outcomes following radical prostatectomy, the value of diagnostic imaging studies, and the probability of pathologically advanced disease among men undergoing radical prostatectomy for suspected early stage disease.
Forthcoming studies using PCOS data will examine treatment complications following radiation therapy and hormonal therapies, and the contribution of sociodemographic and clinical factors to population patterns of treatments used for early stage prostate cancer.
·
NCI - 76
·
Data such as those collected by PCOS re-emphasize the fundamentally critical role still required of carefully designed prospective randomized trials in dissecting the effects of treatments from the effects of patient selection (including self-selection) for particular treatments.
The breakthrough Prostate Cancer Intervention Versus Observation Trial (PIVOT) that has been sponsored by Department of Veteran's Affairs with assistance of NCI should complete accrual by December 2001.
This randomized Phase III trial, which many had feared could not be completed, will compare the long term outcomes of "watchful waiting" with those of initial surgical removal of the prostate.
This trial is intended to determine whether conservative treatment of localized disease may be an acceptable alternative to surgery, at least for some patients.
A longstanding highly controversial question is whether earlier use of hormonal therapy (androgen deprivation) can prolong survival for prostate cancer patients who have not been cured by initial prostatectomy or radiation.
An NCI Intergroup trial that addressed this question in one very high risk setting demonstrated dramatic differences that, together with other evidence, support the assumption that early androgen deprivation may be of benefit in prolonging survival, and not just in shifting the timing of recognition of advanced disease.
In recent years, to accommodate an expansion of the clinical trials effort and meet the challenge of an explosion of new knowledge and promising new classes of agents, NCI has received the advice of panels of external scientists, researchers, cancer survivors, ethicists, and representatives of professional organizations regarding the framework of NCI's large randomized treatment trials (in all cancers).
This process led to recommendations for substantial restructuring consisting of a series of new initiatives and pilot projects.
Together, when fully operational, they are intended to improve the quality and speed of clinical trials, improve access to trials for patients and doctors, and foster innovative clinical research that hastens the transition from laboratory to patients.
Details of the Clinical Trials Restructuring effort can be found at http://plan2002.cancer.gov/infenhancing.htm and therefore will not be detailed here.
However, because of its public health consequences, prostate cancer was selected as one of the two tumor types in which all of these new initiatives would be tested.
It should be noted that all of these new initiatives are inherently open, competitive ones ­ they do not specify that the interventions be drugs; they could be dietary supplements, surgical procedures, new radiation techniques, or gene therapies.
Also, they may be intended for either treatment of established prostate cancers, or for prevention; they may arise within the "conventional" medical research community, or from the alternative medicine community, from academia, or from industry.
New mechanisms for strengthening of the translational interface between laboratory and clinic is in many ways the most delicate and vulnerable part of the entire clinical trials enterprise.
Several new methods were developed to accomplish this goal in different settings: a Clinical Oncology Special Emphasis Panel established by NIH's Center for Scientific Review; funding for correlative science studies that accompany clinical trials via a Program Announcement inviting submission of R01 and R21 grant applications; developmental funds in the cooperative groups to support the generation of pilot data upon which subsequent R01 and R21 applications may be based.
NCI - 77
·
·
·
·
There are also other new and ongoing projects that address issues closely related to clinical trials and patient outcomes.
For example: · The Cancer Care Outcomes Research and Surveillance Consortium (CANCOR) is a new multicenter project consisting of several research center/cancer registry partnerships coordinated by a single data coordination center.
CANCOR is the first major step by NCI to develop a system for obtaining details about cancer care beyond the initial surgical and radiation treatment that is already routinely collected in the SEER Registry.
This will complement the SEER Program and other population-based cancer registries and build the information base needed for measuring and improving the quality of cancer care in the U.S.
A substantial goal of CANCOR is to examine disparities in the receipt of state-of-the-science cancer care and factors that contribute to disparities in outcomes (such as health-related quality of life) and identify ways to lessen those disparities.
The NCI-sponsored Cancer Information Service provides more than 60,000 people annually with information about prostate cancer, research on the disease, screening and treatment options, and information on coping with the physical and psychological side effects of cancer and its treatment.
The NCI web site provides information about prostate cancer clinical trials as well as information about treatment options for every stage of the disease.
NCI's basic print product about the disease, What You Need to Know About Prostate Cancer, is now available on the web.
A new NCI publication, Understanding Prostate Changes: A Health Guide for All Men, will soon be available on the web.
It covers all aspects of prostate cancer in more depth than the basic booklet, but also describes non-cancerous prostate conditions.
Another product in development, called Prostate Cancer Treatment: Know Your Options, will be published in print format soon and will also be available on the NCI web site.
·
Accelerating Drug Development Although there are more new types of agents now in development than ever before, there are many necessary steps on the path between the laboratory bench and clinical use in patients.
Large pharmaceutical firms may have all the necessary resources available to them, and the NCI itself has been able to carry out all the steps for agents in its own development portfolio.
However, many independent investigators in universities or in small or medium size biotechnology companies have faced major delays in completing the work needed before a new agent can start human testing, or in funding the first human trials to find out if an agent appears promising.
NCI has thought carefully about the kinds of barriers that exist in these situations, and developed a package of new programs to fill in the gaps and accelerate the drug development process.
· The Rapid Access to Intervention Development (RAID) and Rapid Access to Prevention Intervention Development (RAIPID) programs are intended to expedite new agent development by moving novel molecules toward clinical trials.
Often academic investigators do not have the resources or cannot afford to complete all safety testing or carry out formulation of an agent in such a way that it can be given to patients.
NCI has created a process that enables investigators to NCI - 78
advance novel molecules to clinical trials when they have not yet found a pharmaceutical or biotechnology industry partner with the necessary resources.
This is done by giving academic investigators access, on a competitive basis, to NCI's preclinical drug development resources and expertise.
Investigators who have molecules that hold promise for cancer treatment are invited to submit applications twice a year.
Those selected for support are assisted with necessary development steps to enable Investigational New Drug Application (IND) filing with the FDA and to begin initiation of proof-of-principle clinical trials.
The investigators are then free to develop industry collaborations in whatever way that suits them.
· The "Quick Trials" program is the next step to actually carry out the preliminary patient clinical trials to find out how best to apply the new intervention and whether it actually does appear to do something useful in patients.
These studies are time-consuming and personnel intensive, and may require sophisticated laboratory or imaging tests.
It is increasingly difficult in today's medical care system to do such trials without grant funding, and it's difficult to get a conventional grant with little preliminary data.
There also can be frustrating and unsatisfactory delays.
For this reason, the Prostate Cancer Quick Trials program was developed by NCI in 1999 to provide a rapid, streamlined funding mechanism for moving novel new ideas for therapeutic interventions into Phase I and II clinical trials for prostate cancer.
This program has been set up in recognition of the urgent need for new types of interventions that are effective at different stages of prostate cancer, as well as the growing number of therapeutic ideas that are ready to be tested in patients.
After piloting this new approach in prostate cancer, it was expanded to all cancers in 2000.
Minority Issues Population differences in incidence or mortality of a particular cancer may arise because of genetic factors, environmental exposures or dietary differences, as a consequence of socioeconomic phenomena such as education, access to care, and behavior; or by some combination of these.
In order to determine which factors are important, it is necessary to carry out all of the following types of scientific studies: surveillance studies in which information is collected on large populations, interventional studies in which some factor is modified, and biologic studies that examine the cancers and the patients themselves.
The Prostate Cancer Outcomes Study (PCOS) was initiated in 1994.
This large, community-based study provides information about reasons for variations in prostate cancer diagnostic and treatment practice patterns, and describes health-related quality of life (HRQL) following treatments for clinically localized and metastatic prostate cancer in a representative patient population.
The size and design of the study permits evaluations of variations in diagnostic and treatment practices, and HRQL, according to geographic region, racial/ethnic sub-groups, income, education, and health insurance status.
In a recent study, PCOS investigators found African-American and Hispanic men had an increased relative risk for presenting with advanced stage cancer.
Traditional socioeconomic, clinical, and pathologic factors accounted for the increased relative risk for Hispanics but not for African-Americans.
AfricanAmericans had more aggressive tumors, suggesting that tumor biology and unmeasured socioeconomic factors may account for the disparity in cancer stage at diagnosis.
NCI - 79
SEER Program data also have shown differing patterns of care among African-American and Caucasian men with prostate cancer.
African-Americans with local/regional prostate cancer are far less likely to be treated with radical prostatectomy or external beam radiation.
Studies are now geared toward determining the reasons for these disparities in care.
Encouragingly, however, NCI and DOD staff have shown that equal treatment yields equal outcome within disease stages.
This finding suggests that NCI efforts to improve prevention, diagnosis, and treatment of this disease have the potential to benefit all patients equally.
Genetics and Gene-Environment Interactions: The NCI funds a number of studies comparing populations to assess genetic variation and gene environment interactions that may lead to the varied incidence of prostate cancer.
These studies include large scale epidemiologic studies and are often linked to basic science laboratory projects.
Below is a summation of several ongoing NCI sponsored research projects and their findings to date: · A case control cohort study of a multi-ethnic group of 202,136 individuals in the Western U.S. to determine the genetic risk of prostate and several other cancers.
This cohort is of sufficient size and heterogeneity to study the relationship between environmental risk factors and genes that may be important alone or as sources of potential interaction in determining the risk of sporadic cancers of the colorectal, prostate, and breast.
This project has a substantial number of African-Americans, Hispanics, Japanese-Americans and Caucasians.
The study investigates polymorphisms in candidate genes that might alter metabolism of endogenous or exogenous exposures, and their interactions with dietary variables (e.g., saturated fat and fiber intake) and other exogenous exposures (e.g., hormone replacement therapy) that affect the risk of these three cancers.
This work is being done by researchers at the University of Hawaii and the University of Southern California.
Several NCI studies are assessing the association among 5 alpha-reductase genotype, race, obesity, diet, physical activity, and prostate cancer risk.
One such study is a collaboration with the National Heart Lung and Blood Institute to increase efficiency.
This study evaluates lifestyle and genetic determinants of serum steroid hormone and binding protein levels in 631 African-American and 873 Caucasian male participants of the Coronary Artery Risk Development in (Young) Adults (CARDIA).
Investigators will utilize previously collected and stored serum and DNA samples.
Results of this study will provide the first longitudinal analyses of steroid hormone changes and their correlation in a bi-racial population.
The Shanghai Prostate Cancer Study is a population-based case-control study of prostate cancer in China, where the reported incidence for clinical prostate cancer is the world's lowest, but rising rapidly.
To date, the study has provided etiologic leads to help clarify the reasons for the substantial racial difference in prostate cancer risk.
One, case-control study compares prostate cancer risk for African-American (449 cases, 543 controls) and Caucasian men (483 cases, 658 controls).
So far, the study has found that risk for NCI - 80
·
·
·
the disease is increased among the brothers and fathers of men with a history of prostate cancer and for heavy users of alcohol.
A study of dietary patterns linked greater consumption of fat from animal sources to increased risk for prostate cancer for both African-Americans and Caucasians.
Use of tobacco did not appear to be related to prostate cancer risk.
· A population-based-case-control study of occupation and prostate cancer in Detroit examines the effects of occupational exposures on the subsequent risk of prostate cancer.
Thus far this and other studies have linked work in cadmium-contaminated environments with increase risk of prostate cancer.
A study of farmers and their families (The Agricultural Health Study) is a prospective cohort study of about 90,000 Americans, in collaboration with NIEHS, NIOSH, and EPA.
The study includes licensed private pesticide applicators, their spouses, and commercial pesticide applicators.
Pesticides, sunlight, viruses, mycotoxins, well water contaminants, and a variety of other occupational exposures are suspected to play a role in the observed excess risk of prostate and other cancers.
Investigators will also examine disease risks among spouses and children of farmers.
An sero-epidemiologic prospective study hopes to identify biochemical markers related to common cancers occurring among 11,132 American Japanese subjects examined in Hawaii.
Investigators will use the subjects' frozen stored serum obtained years prior to the diagnosis of cancer to determine whether low serum selenium or isoflavonoid levels increases the risk of prostate cancer.
Research is on-going at the NCI on inter-individual variability in genes that regulate androgen activity and their effect on individual susceptibility to prostate cancer.
Androgenic hormones are essential to prostate function and are believed to play a key role in prostate carcinogenesis.
NCI investigators confirmed that healthy Chinese men tend to have long series of CAG nucleotide repeats in the androgen receptor gene.
This trait is associated with reduced androgenic activity and is consistent with the observation that Chinese men have a low risk for prostate cancer.
The investigators also showed that Chinese prostate cancer cases had shorter CAG repeats in the androgen receptor gene compared to healthy control subjects, indicating that CAG repeat length can potentially serve as a useful marker to identify individuals at high risk for clinically significant prostate cancer.
NCI is currently funding four Specialized Programs of Research Excellence (SPOREs) grants conducting prostate cancer research.
These were recently augmented to increase their emphasis on cancer etiology, especially etiology in African American populations and comparisons between African and Asian American men, and to enhance training opportunities for minority pre-doctoral and post-doctoral individuals.
An underlying theme of research training in prostatic neoplastic diseases in African Americans will be gene-lifestyle interactions and patterns of medical care that impact prognosis, quality of life and mortality.
SPORE supplements will also support diagnosis and evaluation of biological aggressiveness and treatment options in African American men, and a highdensity tissue microarray of prostate cancer tumors that will facilitate examining the influence of race along with molecular, pathological, and clinical factors.
NCI - 81
·
·
·
·
·
Studies involving culturally diverse populations of prostate cancer survivors and their partners will assess the long-term impact of the treatment regimens used for prostate cancer.
Investigators will survey about 2100 patients and 1650 spouses, using a cross-sequential design to assess QOL, depression, and treatment satisfaction at 5, 8, and 11 years post treatment.
Of interest is how outcomes vary according to ethnicity (Chinese, Filipino, Hawaiian, Japanese, and Caucasian) and primary prostate cancer therapy (surgery, radiation, other).
Information Dissemination: NCI sponsored assessments of the needs of minority lower socio-economic cancer patients demonstrate the need for cancer related information and improvement of skills to manage pain.
Several studies are currently aimed at developing multi-media education and training materials that are linguistically and culturally appropriate for Hispanic and African American populations.
One study, entitled Information Needs of African American Cancer Patients, consisting of random sample of 250 African American and 250 Caucasian prostate cancer patients and their families, explores the interconnection of such factors as patient information seeking, patient-provider communication, participation in treatment decision making, and emotional adjustment.
Several of the NCI's Special Populations Networks are working with the Cancer Information Service and involved in information dissemination on prostate cancer issues including the potential risks and benefits of screening.
The National Black Leadership Initiative on Cancer, for example, has linked with the 100 Black Men of America and other African-American fraternal organizations to provide information and sources from which one can obtain more detailed information when needed.
NCI funded (in total or in part) 246 clinical trials in prostate cancer, including 80 Phase III studies and 37 Phase II studies.
NCI clinical studies in prostate cancer have significant African-American participation.
One study shows that 14.7 percent of men enrolled onto NCI sponsored prostate cancer treatment trials are African American while 10.3 percent of Americans diagnosed with prostate cancer are African American.
All NCI clinical trials, whether large or small, routinely examine outcome data to determine if there appears to be a difference in response to treatment with regard to race or ethnicity.
Of course, only large trials can determine this with a good degree of statistical certainty.
Thus far, there is very little evidence that suggest that there are differential responses to therapy in different racial groups.
However, even in the initial trials of new agents (which are necessarily small trials), NCI scientists look for trends that suggest differences that should be looked for when larger studies are designed.
NCI, along with the American Cancer Society and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention sponsored a Leadership Conference on Prostate Cancer in the African-American Community in November of 1997.
Developed in cooperation with the 100 Black Men of America, the Intercultural Cancer Council, the National Black Leadership on Cancer, and the National Prostate
·
·
·
·
·
NCI - 82
Cancer Coalition, the conference represented a significant step toward developing a strategy for the full participation of African Americans in prostate cancer research and control.
Quality of Life Decisions about treatments are not easy to make.
At present, it is difficult to predict whether a tumor will grow slowly with no health consequences to the patient or grow quickly and become lifethreatening.
Also, except for the PIVOT study previously discussed, there are few randomized trials that compare the relative benefits of treating early stage patients with radiation therapy, radical prostatectomy (surgical removal of the entire prostate gland along with nearby tissues), or watchful waiting (following the patient closely and postponing aggressive therapy unless symptoms of the disease progress).
In spite of these uncertainties, it is known that certain treatments -- radiation therapy, radical prostatectomy, or hormonal therapies -- can have detrimental effects on urinary, bowel, and sexual functions.
To date, there have been no accurate estimates of the changes in functional status among men treated in everyday community settings.
The PCOS, discussed above in section four and Minority Issues, includes among other goals an evaluation of the impact of treatments for primary prostate cancer on long-term complications and the quality of life of patients.
PCOS is the first systematic evaluation of health-related quality-of-life issues for prostate cancer patients conducted on a multi-regional scale, and includes approximately 3,500 men diagnosed with the disease.
By collecting patient survey data on the health outcomes of various treatments for prostate cancer, the PCOS will help patients, their families, and physicians make more informed choices about treatment alternatives.
Communicating with cancer patients, individuals at high risk for cancer, the general public, and the health care community is a central component of NCI's mission and mandate.
For prostate cancer, NCI communicates information to all of those groups, as well as to the cancer research community.
Materials available from NCI, including print, video, and web products, range from basic information about the disease, information about research now ongoing to improve understanding and management of the disease, and information for men about early detection and treatment options.
One of the most recent communications initiatives is a partnership with the prostate cancer advocacy organization, US TOO, to develop a national communications initiative, called Know Your Options, to better inform men and their families about the disease.
The initiative is based on an information package or kit that provides a solid base of information about prostate cancer to help US TOO chapters work with their hometown media.
The media, in turn, use the information provided by US TOO with the NCI endorsement to keep their readers, listeners, and viewers informed about the disease.
The kit includes the latest medical and scientific information available, as well as information about where US TOO chapter leaders can go for more information, advice, and help.
Expanding Research NCI's commitment to expanding all aspects of prostate cancer research can be appreciated by the NCI - 83
increased funding over the last 3 years, from $86.
